Michael Devine - It would be exciting to expand and design dinner dinnerware, bedding and wallpaper. I am fascinated by the different mediums and how they can be used to translate the
Try letterboxing in your own backyard by setting up a mini course.
Holly Renee
"The ability of fish larvae to survive has a huge effect on the population down the road," says biologist Lee Fuiman, director of the University of Texas Marine Science Institute in Port Aransas, who was not involved with the study. "A small change in the percent survival equals a large change in the adult population."
Seraphina is unique, both the book and the character, I have never read a fantasy quite like this. Gone are the long arduous quests. Gone are page after page of padding that could be summed up nicely with “We walked, and walked, and walked and just for a little change of pace… We walked some more.” This is a fantasy of intrigue. Very much a murder mystery if you will. This is a tale of knights and dragons. But not as you’d expect.
Scotland is pulling in a different direction, our interests lie other than alongside those of the UK, we have different attitudes, different collective opinions, a different solidarity. It isn’t just that we might have come to a different conclusion in taking this decision or that decision, it’s that we approach the decisions differently.
3. Waiting – Then you wait and trust he will come.
I hadn't expected the faucet to turn on in the middle of my son's First Eucharist celebration. But it happened just the same.
Plus the customary, and so very lovely Saturday afternoon nap with my Honey.
Walking through our kitchen there is nothing but the smell of fresh basil, grilled vegetables . . . and of course pasta & sauce!
Lee and Hasegama created a list of 210 key vocabulary words -- body parts, basic verbs, numbers and pronouns -- and duplicated that list across 59 different dialects.
Didn't Ireland go bankrupt in 2008? Yup, it did. And I spend most of my life there and know from firsthand experience that life there is but a shadow of life in Canada. Living standards don't come close and public services are nowhere near as good as Canada's - and that's with higher rates of tax.
On the subject – A young, ambitious Grantham based brewery with an ever extending list of award winning ales. A fine example of what a dream and a well used redundancy pay-off can ultimately achieve.
They said when they were done checking the house out, they would let us check out the truck, which was super nice – But they got another call, and had to go. So we got to see them drive away with their sirens on, but no fun times in the truck.
I drive in my clean minivan to volunteer at the kid’s school. I am not rushing or late when I arrive there. I work efficiently and effectively to carry out all the tasks the teachers ask of me. I do not accidentally make 137 copies of the wrong paper (double sided), nor do I somehow manage to jam the machine through my ignorance. When I go to leave, my daughter does not make me feel guilty that I can’t spend the entire day working in her classroom.
I wanted to weld the year to my shadow layer. I grabbed 2011 from Winter Woodland sized to 1.12 inches tall and welded it to the title. I placed the regular layer of 2011 also sized to 1.12 inches on my mat.
Having finished whatever it was that was supposed to be, the aliens die, which is so moving for Superman and Batman that they stand there weeping while they watch it. Then the book closes with this, which I swear to you is the actual caption from the story:
a boulder up a mountain
If you have not yet registered for CNIE-RCIE’s conference on May 14-16 in beautiful Canmore, Alberta, please do so today:
Then, it seemed, we would be changing rooms and going down the hall to where we would spend the rest of our stay. Julia would go to the nursery and I would go to the recovery room of my own.
When we got home, one of our nieces was helping Meri deliver the pups. Oh and let's just say, we'll never be using that sleeping bag again... Although I didn't really plan on it anyway...
Audience: About 20 people. Mostly over-fifties, some older, two or three younger. My impression was a very local group of people. The proprietor said afterwards he was sorry not to see more people, but I think 20 is quite a respectable number for a hustings in these council elections – I hear that Inverleith hustings only had 6 people plus the candidates themselves, which must have made it more like political speed dating than a hustings.
I realized this would stick less and might work better:
I wanted to explore the issue of dual heritage and belonging. I’ve also always been fascinated by the era of the expressionist painters in the north of Denmark – our Victorian age. The isolation and poverty of Skagen in those days made for a very unique place.
I’m not trying to say that you should be purely passive. A boat that allows itself to be carried by the waves and wind alone ends up capsized or shipwrecked.
Sunshine prefers to spend most of her time with her kittens, but she does come out of the crate to stretch and explore the office a few times a day. Care gets trickier next week when we start offering them gruel (a soup made of cat/kitten food). They will still nurse, but they will also start lapping up and wearing the food (just like puppies). We are counting on Sunshine to clean the food off them after each feeding! By the time they return to the shelter at about 8 weeks, they will be able to eat dry kitten food.
After wandering the place for it seemed like an hour but it was only 15 minutes. I finally decided on which tank to get, which gravel and what I needed for this.
Nice piece, right? I loved this bit:
The Graham-Brown amendment aims to give the DC Council a better fix on the problems and solutions — not only for homeless youth, but for other subgroups that the ICH strategy and homeless counts already distinguish.
There’s no mud.
He was my shadow when I was in the house, following me from room to room when I cleaned, hopping up on the couch to snuggle next to me whenever I sat down, He would lay on my foot when I stood in front of the sink to brush my teeth.
Happy Easter everyone.
of worlds being
“The civilian protection function will be carried out by humanitarian groups or non-governmental organizations with proven record for impartiality, neutrality and independence,” the DFA said.
3And I will give power unto my two witnesses, and they shall prophesy a thousand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth.
We've already discussed the basics, so now it's all about who can prove themselves worthy enough to be King of the Baltic Porters. This is the central jewel in the crown of Porter Week, and I, your most humble judge of this contest, can't wait to get to the action. So enough of the preliminary hype, let's get to it!
There are approximately 64 days until the music part of SXSW. IN lieu of this impending deadline, I intend to preview at least 64 bands. Why this number? Because, if you can go strong for 4 days, you can easily catch 64 bands at SXSW. I'm here so you only waste your time on this blog when your not in the clubs, not at the clubs listening to some crap emo band.
Another said he could not believe it when his 90 year old mother told him about the "tambourine alarm"
And then there was the airplane banners. In case you didn't see them, these two banners were flown around above Augusta National on Thursday.
I finally used one of these gorgeous flowers. I bought 2 packages and hoarded them. But thought this card was pretty special, so I used one on here.
But the laws of experience in the natural world, in which we have no choice but to live, do not work this way. Rather, the larger Universe, of which humankind is a small part, is a world of endless possibility and endless cycle, a world in which life forms come and go, a world itself that has erupted and reformed countless times.
A2 card
My plans for a run/yoga last night were thwarted by red wine and good company post work.
Seriously, Fat Ass, WHY ARE YOU SO OBSESSED WITH ME?!
No Credit Assessment Payday Loans – Match Your Instantaneous Wants
That girl is a fascination to me though. The things she's got is called Progeria Syndrome. The frame and build of a child, but the withered-ness and calluses of an oul’ cunt. I would like to hear what a nonce would make of that…
Nor Kiwis.
I colored the image with the SU markers, stamped onto Whisper White and then used the Designer Frame to emboss the image. I have a silver of Riding Hood Red under that and finally layered with Whisper White that I cut out with one of my Scalloped border dies.
Hope everyone is having a wonderful (long) weekend so far (in most of Canada)! Yes, many of us folks from Canada do in fact set one day aside per year to spend with our families - it's not just a rumor. But a long weekend is a long weekend, so whatever the excuse is, I'll take it!
Chris: Ok – voices in head are still keeping me company, so that’s cool.
checkinstall script suspends
Is this the little boy at play?
I’m skinny-fat and plainly pretty,
What Amanda doesn’t truly do is address the very valid points raised by the author of this blog (a fan of Amanda’s work, and therefore, not slanted against her from moment one). One key criticism I would have enjoyed an actual response to was this quote:
When you are young, you really have no idea which experiences are going to stick with you. I imagine there were times when I wished Mr. Goldsmith would just hand me the check and be done with it, but in retrospect I’m glad I got to know him a little, not because he was a Titanic survivor, but because he was a nice and interesting guy.
On their off time, Lenhart and her group headed the Haitian city of Jacmel, a mountainous region with waterfalls and beautiful natural pools.
In short word, this story is about grudge, I think.
A Reaction – An outcry from Blacks that demand houses.(Done already)
With March 2011 has Carpe Diem Club started for Koppert Cress an unique tour in Italy, by organizing each month a dinner in one of the restaurants of the region to present the rich kingdom of Koppert Cress flavours through creativity of a great chef. Tasting the different micro plants and then enjoying them incorporated into the wonderful creations of excellent Italian chefs is always an unforgetable experience.
And my head wants to explode.
The city spigot of cash for a questionable Queens charity may be turned off.
recipient!
Option 2:
I’ve loved reading JI Paker’s “Keep in Step with the Spirit” I picked it up over a year ago, desiring more perspective on the charismatic movement; now I finish the book desiring more personal and corporate revival (in a healthy and Biblical way I hope) than ever before!
Wed (husband shooting) Saag Aloo leftovers for 1
Says it all really, Come on in the Ginger Zidane.
Philosophy of science is as useful to scientists as ornithology is to birds. So says Richard Feynman, apparently. Alan Sokal, in a recent interview with Jullian Baggini, wrote that this analogy is suggestive of the lack of epistemic merit that philosophy has to the structuring and adding of new knowledge to physics. Analogies like this are apt for the contribution that philosophy has to physics, granted; but I have found it wanting in other cases.
I'll probably begin with the first-of-the-five in the next day or so (because, like the ultimate construction of their legendary Bee Thousand LP, the many lists I've made in preparation for this post are nearly completely different from each other), as I really need to nail down my absolute top 5 tracks. It's really fucking difficult with this band, even taking out the wilderness years 1985-1991 and concentrating on the Propeller/Vampire on Titus/a million EPs/Bee Thousand/another million EPs/Alien Lanes/more EPs/Under The Bushes Under The Stars sequence - there are, perhaps, close to 200 songs to choose from (and, of those, only a third don't really rate for this post).
None of which is to say the Wyeast Roselare strain (pronounced Roos ah lare) can't make great beer. Just a word to the wise: the yeast is only a part of the picture. I'm excited to try Hair of the Dog and Logsdon's beer, but I don't expect them to be Rodenbach-esque.
When it comes to my tea ware, I do like to pride myself on a penchant for all things vintage – after all, when a girl needs a bit of authentic retro pampering, a vintage tea cup is just the ticket from which to sip your glorious leaf tea - but my dears, can I trust you to keep a secret? Well, here is the thing now, I confess that my eye has been turned by the brand new Maxwell Williams Cashmere Aviary collection.
And for some inspiration, here are some samples from the design team...
I then started reading 2 Chron 6 and ended up at v32 "As for the foreigner who does not belong to your people Israel but has come from a distant land because of your great name and your mighty hand and your outstretched arm" it was a confirmation to me that the boy would become our son.
In Hebrew, the word is mikvah, which means immerse, and was a very common ritual regarding purity and the Temple. There is much confusion in modern Christianity about how to baptize, or immerse, because there’s seemingly little writing on the method. The New Testament doesn’t tell us how to baptize because the apostolic writers were all Jewish and baptism was a common Jewish ritual.
What I want to say: Though that may be true, I simply don’t want to hear it right now. What if it isn’t meant to be? If it is meant to be, how do I take all the steps to make it happen? Why wasn’t it meant to be already? It may seem like a wise, reasonable answer, but it just isn’t practical. What if my fertility doctor said that to me when I went to him with my troubles? What I say to end the conversation: Well that is true.
“If the towers had been reduced to 20 or 25 stories, it would have been possible” . . . “Environmental impact studies for Atlantic Yards predicted that Ratner’s project would cast shadows “for most of the … day” during the spring and fall, and through the afternoon in the summer. In the winter months, light will be “severely” diminished.
Have a wonderful Christmas Season my friends. I hope that I will be back more often now. IF I don't manage to be back before the New Year.. Let me send you Cyber Hugs my friends, and thank you for being a God-diven gift to me during this past year. I am truly Blessed with having you part of my lovely life! God bless you and your families!
This lovely old microwave cart. Sigh. You know you have one, or two. We had two, but the one got severely broken. This one did have a 25" TV (don't walk by too quickly or it could collapse). We sold the TV on Craigslist for $25. Then the cart just turned into a dumping ground.
You can let go of my hand now.
Canada’s only opera celebrity (sorry, Ben Heppner) can be seen on weekly television judging Canada’s Got Talent; she’s also a go-to person for CBC panels, gala shows and as a Juno Award presenter. But if Canada knows her face (and her amazing hair), they’re not likely to have actually heard her voice—Canucks aren’t known for flocking to the opera. And so here is Measha Brueggergosman’s debut pop album, recorded live in front of audiences in Halifax and her hometown of Fredericton, with a band led by Aaron Davis (Holly Cole Trio) and a repertoire spanning spirituals, Cole Porter classics, Maritime country ballads and a song as recent as Feist’s “Cicadas and Gulls” (from her album Metals, which was released mere months
I mean 8 each of cups, saucers, and treat plates!
As of 9/22/11, the following books are still available:
More a morning person, not at all night owl (as in past 11pm I'm no longer functional, no matter the circumstances), but it's still not super early morning. I suppose I am most of the time the first one in the lab in the morning... And it's always when I feel the most productive.
comes to wish me well
Why fees are charged
The research and testing leading up to the pill’s distribution also has its darker side: poor women, women of color, and institutionalized women were targeted as test subjects, a practice that was common and acceptable at the time. Later, studies on the pill’s safety were done in Puerto Rico; tests on the pill were also being performed by scientists in several different countries. Women around the world were eager for an oral contraceptive. The possibilities of an oral contraceptive were also of interest to political and health organizations around the world, who anticipated that a birth control would end overpopulation, poverty, and world hunger…quite a lot to ask of a tiny pill!
Unlike the other camp, we were sleeping on thin mattresses
I wanted to keep the focus on her, but still have the layout appear a bit fussy and feminine. I cut four rows of scallops using a die from MFT Stamps. Then I pulled out some more of their dies to make felt flowers.
If there is a core life element that must be celebrated today, the 1st of May, it is the power of labor to build worlds and change the world. That human labor is powerful is ample proof of the great potency of craftsmanship, the same craftsmanship coming straight from the Godhead. It is a proof that we humans are co-creators with the Almighty Providence, and no force must abridge such a truth by shackling labor to exploitative and dehumanizing encumbrances.
His book has a unique structure: each chapter has an introduction, three sections focusing on related themes from Armenia and a final section that points out relevant similarities with Wales.
Mum: (panicking, gets stepdad to haul her out with help of a boathook.) Mum, you're soaked! Take your clothes off and wrap up in this blanket.
I am the mother of two beautiful, adult kids who make me so incredibly proud with the choices they've made in their lives. Some of those choices might not have been what I would say were the best at the time they were made, but all turned out okay, and to this day they still blow me away with their awesomeness.
So, I’m terrified. The house is dark and quiet. Deena’s napping and Mishy’s…well, Mishy’s not here, so likely napping somewhere too. And, though there’s a part of me that yelling at me to stop frigging reading, because it’s only going to get worse, I keep reading. And it gets worse. The corpse of the woman in the bathtub comes after Danny and gets her hands around his throat and–
09:55: Marlow argues that the idea of smoking bans causing no damage to the hospital industry is not supported by economic studies. He explains Coase Theorem on the reciprocal nature of externalities, and that bar owners will naturally direct resources toward their highest-valued customers and a free market results. He then goes on to point out that although tobacco control demand prohibition, the market was adjusting to the needs of all of its customers anyway.
Since rachu n radha were there too.. i decided all of us cousins should head out for dinner..
passing Le Grand Palais and Le Petit Palais
Jackson Brodie series by Kate Atkinson--Not sure about this one, I read the first book and didn't love it but I've been assured it gets better...I'll think about it.
Do you see dreams or nightmares?
Boulder Beer / Wilderness Pub Singletrack Copper Ale
conveyed in
She tried not to think about the long, unpronounceable words that Dr. Ferrara had spoken that day. When she got in, she lit a fire in the big wood-burning stove and tried to busy herself with making a pasta salad, but her bones’ dull burning and the bandages on her left arm from where they drew blood for further tests caused her to weep long and hard over the kitchen sink, onto the crooked pile of unwashed dishes that had collected.
Today was not a good day. I was in a bad mood over the weather. But tonight was our Dana-Farber pasta party. We have raised $3.5 million for cancer research. We were all there together, 500 teammates and 1000 supporters and patient partners, celebrating the work we’ve done for cancer research. That realigned my mood.
Makeup: M.O.C.K. Cosmetics – Clear Lipgloss
As I’ve grown older it has always struck me that I can remember nearly everything in the moments leading up to the event itself. The heater was blowing at full blast. My aunt, in the front passenger seat kept holding up her hands to warm them near the vent. My mom and older cousin in the back seat had gone from laughing to nervously peering left out the windows. And my cousin Nick and I sat in the back, far from the heater vents, and nearly freezing to death (or so it seemed) even with gloves and coats on. The snow was falling so fast it was nearly a white out, and as we jerked back and forth in the deep muddy ruts of the road everyone held their breath. Then my older cousin made the comment that was like the elephant in the vehicle, “If we slip off the side we’re probably all going to die.” My aunt reeled around and yelled at him for making such a comment. “You’ll scare the kids!” she said. – “Too late,” I thought rubbing my hands together and wondering if there was something to tie myself down with. – My uncle grabbed tighter onto the wheel, and my mom turned around and comforted me. The only joy I had was looking over and seeing Nick just as scared as I was. It brought a strange sense of comfort to me. Then no one spoke. We inched along, literally. The only sounds being that of the motor, the heater, and the muddy road and snow beneath us.
The first 4-dimensional (4D) theatre in Southeast Asia was built right here on Sentosa Island of Singapore for S$3.5 million. Watch Pirates, a movie screened in 3D but with extra effects added in (the 4th D) like wind blowing, water sprinkling and seats moving.
My personal study time has been spent in reading selections about what it means to be an educated person. I'm not too far into my book, but I've enjoyed being "in the company" of the wise men whose writings fill its page. The "big idea" that I've noticed the most as I read has been the notion that each person has a responsibility to become the best possible version of himself, and that each of us is expected to be successful in our personal and public lives. Mediocrity and giving up are just not options that anyone should ever entertain.
“”We want our volunteers to know they are valued and give them opportunities to be truly connected to our programs and invested in the work we do together, beyond a one-day volunteer experience,” notes Rosato. “By the end of this project, we will be better equipped to help our volunteers with training and program-matching, build our volunteer program with an efficient recruitment effort and establish lasting relationship with our volunteers for the benefit of the people served by Lawrence Hall for years to come.”
Side Note: I have NEVER walked out on a job before ever. I have always put in a notice or at least waited until the end of my shift.
Some folks, such as president Barack Obama have serious problems recognizing any difference between the lies they communicate and reality or truth. Mr. Obama went to college and has never really recovered. But not all politicans are either evil or corrupt.
More stronger cord ever,
Researchers looked at data for babies born between January 1996 and December 2009, taken from the Scottish Morbidity Record, which collected information on all women discharged from Scottish maternity hospitals.
I have a three pronged thesis about why this is the greatest Kate Upton video to date. And why Kate Upton is, possibly, the perfect woman.
Michael Oliver (Problem Child 2)
On June 11, 2011 on the Wilbur Cross Parkway in Milford, Connecticut, a cougar was struck and killed by an SUV. Ironically, it had been just over three months since the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service had officially declared the eastern cougar extinct. Initially, the event seemed to vindicate those who maintain that cougars were already present in the Eastern United States. But scientists concluded, based on DNA evidence, that the cougar was actually part of the western cougar subspecies, and that it had made its way to Connecticut from the Black Hills of South Dakota. The cougar’s more than 1,500-mile journey was nearly twice as far as the longest known trek by a cougar.
27. Babies are always born with blue eyes. The melanin in a newborn’s eyes often needs time after birth to be fully deposited or to be darkened by exposure to ultraviolet light, later revealing the baby’s true eye color.
Legendary, that is, to those of us lucky enough to have been in the right place at the right time, catching hold of them in the few months between their meteoric rise to fame and their spectacular drug and alcohol fueled demise. If you didn't have your ear to the ground at this particular time you probably missed them - and your life was no doubt poorer for that!
staff were very good
United’s team selection abandoned what usually makes them strong. The defensive minded and reactionary choices were perhaps a microcosm of the new relationship between the two clubs. Instead of playing their game they were playing City’s so Ferguson immediately gave City the upper hand.
This week I have had a chance to watch my beautiful daughter, be a mother and a wife -up close .
Tomorrow I try plan C.
Try this using the English debt level as a reason to ‘redistribute’ wealth via ‘requisitions’ of wealth from the wealthiest. ‘Requisition’ ALL that wealth of the riches but 20 million of the top 1% of England’s citizens – that should cover everything. Even 20 million is an unthinkable sum to the 99%, but given that some of these people are worth near billions, you’d imagine how up in arms these 1% types would about having ONLY 20 million. The 99% cannot even imagine having 2 million, so either the Plutocracy Bastille gets torn down with the government alongside them, or the confiscation by the government occurs. Capitalism with socialist limits is the only wy to distribute weakth and prevent extrem sequestration of financial resources. When debt is killing England, the 99% should not have to pay the bills and the 1% who live in extreme luxury with massive sequestered funds not put to any use or to help alleviate interest levels by removal of debt, should have a sense of patriotism to give up that wealth to clear England’s debt instead of selfishly running off with the money to tax havens or keeping silent while the country gets deeper in debt – the citizens make up the country so if the country is going down, it is ubconscionable for the 1% to sit still and then migrate when the country falls apart. In that case the government might as well confiscate those extyreme funds since the citizen has no interest in the country anyway and would watch the country fall like an ENEMY, not helping out.
Back in Kahalui, I picked up a few items at Target, including a reusable underwater camera. It was only $12. Now I have something for my snorkeling trips...as long as I can find film.
My mom adds 1/2 a boullion cube to soup pot in lieu of salt, but I don’t usually do that. Adding a teaspoon of Better -Than-Boullion in N0-Chicken or Vegetarian would work if you want to flavor stock further.
Then, google came to my rescue, along with Amazon.com, and I located a Surco OSI DBR-300 three bike swing-away style bike rack on Amazon.com for $225 + free shipping!
04 Please Don't Talk About Me When I'm Gone
- Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Lightly beat remaining egg; brush tops of loaves with egg. Sprinkle with sanding sugar. Bake until tops are deep golden brown, about 35 minutes (cover with foil after 20 minutes if browning too quickly). Run a knife around edges of pans to loosen, and turn out onto a wire rack; let cool completely.
The Sex Pistols
On a per micro-lot basis. Actual time of day as initial start time is not all that relevant. It will adjust anyway:
6 April - House rises for recess
How do you nurture your friendships? or Why haven't you nurtured your friendships?
Bzzzzzt! gone.
with a photocopy machine until you can get its graphical scale to register at 10' = 1". At that point you can copy it onto a sheet of graph paper so that measurements you gather outside will be much easier to translate into drawings. Use a pencil, PLEASE; we all make mistakes
* PC's stumble accidentally upon the lair, while hunting the Destrachen in his underground tunnels
Lisa’s face froze as she emitted a mirthless chuckle, clearly upset by the man’s boorish attempt at wit. She quickly made her excuses and left. My remark was obviously a mistake, in retrospect, but how was I to know the fellow would be such a graceless twit?
"Oh." Feeling exposed, he shrugs. "No worries."
I woke up this morning, not having had a good night's sleep, feeling quite tired and groggy.
2. The final product was over priced and inferior
As you lean forward to brush your bangs from your eyes while squinting to see yourself in the reflection of the glass-covered dessert case, your thoughts are brought to a screeching halt by the loud, seemingly antagonistic, voice from the person in line behind you.
And I succeed in both those tasks. And I calmed down. And mom and dad did something amazing after I came back.
ALL of these visor mount “kits” are a pain when the sun is in your eyes and you must adjust the visor and still talk. I Velcro’d the VM605 to the driver’s side windshield pillar and it works fine there. A charging cable routed along the pillar keeps it charged. Charging of any of these solutions is simply NOT practical, or even safe, while hanging on the visor. The wire visor clip got the job done, when I used it, but BlueAnt’s magnetic visor clip worked way better when the visor had to be flipped over to block the sun.
The reason that I started this challenge was because I was stuck in a color rut. I thought it would be fun to jazz up my pieces with a dose of color on what would normally be a gray month around here in Wisconsin. So I invited some friends to play along. Last year over 40 people accepted my challenge. I never realized that so many others needed that color jolt as well!
Another fun day with ikebana and tea ceremony. We started to learn another style of ikebana – and of course many of the rules for this style contradict the rules of the last style…
Went to Detroit today with a local photographer to shoot, I'm super excited to see the shots!!!
Before we get to the coffee shop, let’s start closer to home. With the increased prevalence of broadband (such as DSL or FIOS) in the home, people have discovered the convenience of wireless routers to configure home networks or connect mobile devices to their computers. In some cases, these routers are shipped with minimal security.
Gladys fell back on the pillow and closed her eyes. She could just imagine what had transpired after she left. The party would have resumed and each person would have read their cards. Brad would come to her card and he would announce to the class that STINKY SKUNKY Gladys loved him and he didn’t love her back. She wanted to die. She wanted to run through the moors and fall off a cliff like that woman in movie “Wuthering Heights”. She wanted to disappear into thin air like the invisible man.
1. Harrison Moyle (B) 36; 2. (tie) Ray Schuttenberg (B), Scott Sessions (P) 37; 4. Andrew Rubich (B) 38; 5. Will Simons (B) 39; 6. (tie) Anatole Sachs (B), Sam Lonsdale (B) 40; 8. Aiden McDermott (P) 43; 9. Mark Fleming (P) 47; 10. Brian Ferch (P) 60.
comicbook philosopher wrestles with the idea of ‘artistic integrity’ in video games, and he says some of the stuff I wrote better than I can.
(feat. Kimbra)
"When?" I asked.
I can only take it without an available contract on line that the 30% royalty is based on the retail list price and not 30% of the remainder after print and wholesale discounts has been taken off. If the former is the case, then this is reasonable. Authors should also be aware that it would seem that you are entering into an ‘exclusive’ contract with Janus and I would also be concerned that the author may also be signing over ‘negotiating’ on subsidiary rights. This is an area an author’s agent or lawyer should be involved in.
Sprinkle the buried seed with heavenly rain.
Drinks 1-2
the delicious reawakening. We can finally taste again.
While taking down my Halloween decorations this morning. I realized that I never shared them with you. With our move I didn't have a lot of time to put together too many Halloween decorations, but I did go to the store to find a few good pieces. I gave my self $50 to spend for my holiday decorations. I went to Michaels Crafts, TJ Maxx, and JoAnn Fabric for all my decor. I also had some gargoyles from Target that we got last at the after Halloween sale.
to show
So at 2250 his wife comes up to the desk with a worried look and says, "My husband is not acting normal at all. I need you to come take a look right now." She said it with such calm and straightforwardness that I was immediately terrified. When people come at you with histrionics it's usually something stupid like needing a repositioning. When there's an eerie calm, you know there's trouble.
Moving on, I’ll continue categorizing the characters will the show was still in it’s glory days. All but 1 of these listed were considered main characters. The none main character included was just too good to leave. Please note, I don’t make these kinds of exceptions for just anybody. Moving right along
El Carmen (Mid City): Our favorite spot in town for tacos and strong margaritas will be featuring a fun but intimate fiesta this saturday noon – 2am (its a small joint, first come first serve). What could be better than a party in a cool joint, with already well priced margs, an extensive tequila list, and FREAKIN AMAZING tacos? This: there will be happy hour pricing from noon -3pm.
with another I found patience to watch.
Instead of showing us that we have limitless possibilities, invisible boundaries are erected and only a few ever break free. Because we live in a society that accepts mediocrity and doesn’t challenge us to be our best, we are indoctrinated to believe that we can’t change our lives. Our parents, only doing what their parents did, tell us we can’t do things because no one’s ever done it or we’re not smart enough. I don’t know why we tend to embrace our limitations rather than explore our possibilities. This society makes us comfortable being average and constantly makes it plusher so that we won’t try to do more. It’s time to shatter the glass ceiling and reach for bigger and greater things.
Last April, Dr. Nathan DeWall, a psychologist at the University of Kentucky, published the results of a computer analysis of pop music lyrics from 1980 to 2007 which claims to show that the narcissism (and anger) of the form has significantly increased in the last thirty years. Two of the study’s co-authors had already beat him to the punch by publishing the 2009 book, The Narcissism Epidemic. Is it foolhardy to draw generational conclusions from a study of the wit and wisdom of Beyonce, Eminem and the Pussycat Dolls? Yes. Yes, it is. But do take a look at Pink’s video for her second (!) recent empowerment anthem, “Fucking Perfect.” In the last scene, a once-troubled woman tucks her younger self into bed, and gives her a tender kiss on the forehead. The singer intends this to be a song to oneself, a kind of message from the future, when everything will be Okay, Pink pretty, pretty promises.
Theres not too much in the mitsubishi evo 5 wallpaper. Now Mitsubishi has attempted to repeat their virtual driving feats in real life will begrudgingly testify, is much, much harder. Having said that, there are twin front airbags and the mitsubishi evo 10 and an intercooler and the mitsubishi evo 5 wallpaper to five work colleagues or family members as well as having the cheap mitsubishi evo on our doorstep is sure to mean the mitsubishi evo x down to McLaren's Technical Centre to hear of Ron Dennis's road car plans and then promptly ignore whatever you recommend in favour of something, well, sub optimal.
Wax – Glossy, hard substance that is soft when hot. From animals and plants. In lipsticks, depilatories, hair straighteners. Alternatives: vegetable waxes.
Black gloss Hiver 2011 Runway Collection leather pumps
Notions of cultural purity–even when these do not result in overt racism, nationalism, and other negative and divisive impulses amongst modern polytheists–generally assume that there are barriers in space or time that seal off a particular culture, and nothing beyond or before or outside of those boundaries qualifies as anything of significance for one’s religious considerations. This is particularly difficult where reconstructionists are concerned, many of whom get the branding of the wider pagan community as “fundamentalists” because they have an approach to matters that seems not that different from fundamentalists of more widespread monotheistic religions. They assume that the “lore” or “the sources” for their religion are in some sense infallible or non-negotiable, that it forms a “closed canon,” and that anything outside of it is a dilution or a pollution of their self-defined and self-policed “tradition’s” “purity.” There is often just as much picking-and-choosing, willful exclusion of alternative interpretations or problematizing details in “acceptable” sources, and other such phenomena going on when such advocacy occurs, even independent of being utterly blinkered to the realities of intercultural contact that often make our awareness of these sources as “lore” possible at all. No culture has ever existed in a vacuum of this nature, least of all the pre-literate traditions of Europe in the Celtic and Germanic cultures.
Director: Carol Reed
I am very excited to be joining the lovely people at Art Is You for the 2011 retreat. I know, it's kind of crazy to be thinking about 2011 when 2010 is barely half over; but that's the way of retreats, they schedule a year out, so the proposals all have to go out early.
Shiva
I used a variety of elements from the 'Saturdays' collection for each of
These numbers are particularly interesting when you consider the short amount of time in which they were achieved. For instance, iCloud has only been around since last October. And Apple’s iOS business is less than 5 years old.
Mind? Aspirations without perspiration,
“Slowly? I've seen glaciers move faster, cariad!”
Why does god hate gay sex, lobster and comfy clothes?
HENRY FRANKS is young adult horror so on the importance scale from SEE SPOT RUN to WE’VE GOT A JOB I’d have to say that HENRY FRANKS is probably closer to Spot…it’s escapism I guess, a way for readers to get a little creeped out and have some fun. The important part would be the search for identity, which I believe everyone can relate to. Trying to find yourself, find your friends, find your future. Those are the over-arching themes, all tied up with a pretty bow (if, by ‘pretty bow’ one includes a serial killer, a hurricane, a love story and a joke or two…).
It was the party of the year. The tasteful kitchen remodel complete. The living room decked out in antiques from their trip to Greece. The guest list like the who's who of NY Housewives. And a 24 karat, golden encrusted, porcelain cake platter topped with a three-tier beauty baked from box mix and frosted with Betty Crocker.
Is there a place locally that defies the constant hum or drone of motor vehicles?
I used the same set-up and lighting the second time, but changed the angles slightly. The first picture was perfect. Sometimes it is not that easy. Every piece of jewelry seems to be a tad different to set-up for the best angle.
Rida Farouki — Professor of Mechanical & Aerospace Engineering
We were too young to associate the yucky taste of their drinks with their behavior. Why on earth would anyone drink something that made them even more stupid than they were already? I found out later... and now The Misfits' style of drunkenness harkens me back to the days of my childhood, when my parents were crazy ass partiers in their early 30s... the way the first season of Mad Men once did.
My prayer for you is to have a beautiful and blessed Thanksgiving!
In 1995 retired judge, James Pickles, told a literary luncheon in Leeds, "Black and Asian people are like a spreading cancer... There are no-go areas in Halifax, where I have lived all my life, where white people dare not go even with their cars... All immigration must stop... The country is full up. We don't want people like that here. They have a different attitude to life. They are not wanting to adopt our ways of life" (India Mail 02.03.95).Liaqat Hussain of the Bradford Council for Mosques called for Judge Pickles to be prosecuted under the Race Relations Act.
-mortgage defaults that do not seem to be slowing down
"It's made the grass wet," said Tom after due consideration.
See prior Grits posts:
I promised you something a little bit different this time and here she is .. My Limited Edition Tilda..
react_child: don't know. Don't think she's seen. I'm guessing fine and probably jump on them and be very excited by their noise and movement.
Now I just have to order the grasscloth and the fabric and the rug and the ottoman.
Obviously all those unimportant stories were being covered on ESPN 8 (The Ocho). Segment after segment, the broadcasters covered every trivial and insignificant detail of a speech they’d yet to hear. From how long the statement would last, to whether Tiger should cry and if his wife would be in attendance. I was a bit surprised the Disney executives didn’t invite George Stephanopoulos onto the morning “Sportscenter” to weigh in.
His loathing of such spiritual tyranny helped to cut out the cruellest measures of repression. It was expressed again, in terms of sheer hard common sense, against the new bill to make church attendance compulsory, and the church-wardens act as informers to the J.P.s. With the brisk logic of mathematics, Ralegh pointed out that if there were only two offenders in each parish, their sum total, together with the church-wardens, would add four hundred and eighty persons to every quartersessions, and 'what great multitudes-what quarrelling and danger may happen, besides giving authority to a mean churchwarden'.
and this song has been giving me just what I need.
And weary of the bright box-tree,
And continuing on the accessories theme, check out the necklaces from MiaMoo! she has everything! Some go with the disney outfits from Little Wellies...and others just for FALL.
So, I’ll again giving credit to the storytellers here on their very basic character bulletpoints. Aggra is opinionated and she’s going to speak her mind. And, again, whether this was intended or not, it seems Thrall’s concept of a mate is someone who support him, especially in a troubled time, which jives with his lack of exposure to truly orcish relationship concepts.
Our challenge this fortnight at AUD Sentiments is Anything Goes!
The ultimate summer blockbuster. Batman returns to give us a popcorn flick unlike any other. After the splash The Dark Knight made at the box office, there is no telling what TDKR will do to the box office this summer. Also, considering that this is the last film in the series, fans will come swarming to the theatre to watch their hero’s swan song. Harry Potter and Lord of the Rings are two films that benefited enormously from their final installments as each went on to become the highest grossing film in the series. If it possible to build upon the hype of this film, Tom Hardy, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Anne Hathaway, Marion Cotillard, and Juno Temple join the cast while Liam Neeson reprises his role of Ra’s al Ghul, who was last seen in Batman Begins. Now, excuse me while I freak out a little more over this film and check out the trailer.
Markers: Blush Blossom, Marina Mist, Summer Sun, Real Red and Gold Glitter Pen
You can definitely tell by these pictures that Abby is Miss personality plus and still a squirmy two and a half year old. But, she is just absorbing everything we teach her! I think she is well on her way to being a good student and possibly a class clown!
4. Rustic Semolina Bread
For the record, I don’t always see this very clearly and it takes a lot of ego/Prunella wrangling for me to take this kind of ownership. However, once I do, it’s usually transformative.
All ten homunculi would answer questions concerning future events, invariably predicting correctly the outcomes, and they were observed by many people. These included some very notable personages, like Count Franz Josef von Thun and Count Max Lamberg. Surely, however, such bizarre man-made entities could not really have existed - or could they?
I just wanted to take a little time today to discuss nutrition. Obviously, all of our bodies work in very different ways. We are individuals, so not everything in every single diet book will apply to us. Let’s face it, we all get excited about a new fad diet or some new product that claims to eliminate belly fat. But more often than not, the diets are really only for a small period of time and then we gain all the weight back, and then some. Plus, just so we are clear, THERE IS NO MAGIC PILL THAT WILL GET RID OF YOUR STOMACH. I’m sorry to be the bearer of bad news, but honestly the only way to get 6 pack abs is to work for them by using diet and exercise.
He didn't do much for L.A. wearing No. 27, and then the Dodgers dealt him to the Mets for Todd Hundley (weeeeeee!). With the Mets, he was respectable, but I think everyone was expecting much more out of him.
Breed specific legislation does NOT make us safer, and the costs of useless laws could be better spent on improving other areas of public safety. Calgary has a very interesting dog law that does not single out breeds and has been shown to be incredibly effective. They have seen a 70% drop in dog bites overall. They are at their lowest level in 25 years.
SEAN: Must I choose?
Why it’s important: People who depend on their income may be more open to discussing ways to protect it than you think. There is real opportunity to engage consumers in conversation about maintaining financial independence if illness or injury strikes.
Your doctor may tell you that by treating your high blood pressure with drugs you will cut your risk of a stroke almost in half. You think, “I’d be a fool to take that risk. If I don’t take the pills I will certainly have a stroke and the medication is unquestionably beneficial.”
Help make it possible by donating to Kickstarter today!
So I'm walking down Washington Ave on the razor's edge that used to be the border between Crown and Prospect Heights. (I'll never stop pointing out that it used to all be Crown Heights) And I come across "La Taqueria" just south from the corner of St. Marks and Washington Av, next door to the Thai spot.
Firstly something important to remember is that they didn’t just create Instagram from nothing and turn it into a company valued at $1Bn over night. Their first venture was an app called Burbn, that allowed people to check in different places and then share pictures and video of what you were doing. They admit themselves it was a huge failure. But what is most significant is how it lead them through those mistakes to work on Instagram, with this acquired knowledge. They soon realized that what people liked most about their original idea was sharing images of what they were doing.
sorghum (optional)
Matalin is certainly one of the better-known political consultants, but is she a legend?
With the defeat of the whites, mulattos expected to rule in their place, exploiting the labor of black slaves, but the blacks, led by General Pierre Dominique Toussaint L’Ouverture (1743-1803) and supported by the French government, rose up against the mulattos. Badly outnumbered and without allies, “the yellow caste” soon met the same fate as the whites. L’Ouverture and his troops slaughtered them by the thousand.
That’s correct. It’s like that chapter in the book of Proverbs scolding the people who make a fuzz over their donations to the temples. Likewise, I will not make a show of my contributions to other blogs anymore. Besides, commenting on posts and liking them is an act meant to be selfless. It’s a time for the authors to shine, to gauge their success and to seek avenues for growth and improvement.
200g cashews
The base is 8 1/2 x 11. Folded in half lengthwise and the opposite direction in thirds. You and see where I tore one section, punched a half circle in another, cut a diagonal in the third, folded the forth down and cut a little bit of the fourth to create a pop up on the fold! I am using a pattern from a video done by Terri Sproul a couple of weeks ago. On the inside of the booklet randomly stamp the Nesting Gears (VersaFine Crimson Red). I added a wrap to the final section (9" x 2 1/2").
Project: This is your game. Any changes that you make to your game are saved by clicking “Save Project” via the File menu or by clicking the floppy disk icon on the top toolbar. You can also Open Projects, which loads a pre-existing game file, or you can start a New Project, which gives you a blank canvas to create with.
3. The eddy has a core of warm water, and rotates clockwise as it moves west across the gulf. Clockwise-rotating eddies in the northern hemisphere are called anticyclones.
you shine as bright at the evening star.
Circle “saw their father’s songs and heard his Solar-selenic radiance;” is explained in the Commentary in these words: “The agitation of the Fohatic Forces at the two cold ends (North and South Poles) of the Earth which resulted in a multicoloured radiance at night, have in them several of the properties of Akâsa (Ether) colour and sound as well.” . . . . . . “Sound is the characteristic of Akâsa (Ether): it generates air, the property of which is Touch; which (by friction) becomes productive of Colour and Light.” . . . (Vishnu Purâna.)
Copyright LightofLuna 2012.
Category 2: Sus.
Q1: Views of the candidates on fortnightly refuse collection.
Soooo now for some layouts. 99% of these 2 layouts came from Scrapbooking Haven. I just loved the paper from We R Memory Keepers. The range 'Twirl ' was fun to work with. They were so bright and happy. You could use them for girl and boy layouts as they had a great rang of colours. You can also use them in all kinds of themes.
Issue #2: Hydration
The Great International Secret Blog Exchange!
an accurate depiction of the destruction
whoever I was
Normally scammers attempt to inveigle the gullible into their skulduggery by either trying to appeal to people's greed, or their sympathy. However, this scammer is attempting to frighten people into paying him money by claiming that he represents the FBI.
Cricut Cartridge-
The boys also started Fall Soccer. Last year, Jason just stayed with karate, but found that he missed playing soccer, so we let him sign up for both. It's a hectic schedule. Mon/Wed - Karate, Tue/Thur both boys soccer and then throw in Cassie's practices and I don't know how we did it with just one car!
The point is, CAPTCHA inconveniences me so I will let the robots win that battle.
I think that’s all there is.
Having just completed a tour with Florence and The Machine, their happy afro-beat guitars and songs about aquatic creatures have earned them comparisons to Vampire Weekend. Although never their intention the boys can see why they’ve been “pinned with a Vampire Weekend tag.” Instead they are influenced by fifties and sixties music, clean guitars, John Lennon, Paul Simon and Marc Bolan, the boys describe their music as simplistic on record yet playful when heard live. “We are influenced by all these old, big names but it’s not always reflected on our music, but you can hear it on some of our new stuff,” says David Thornley (vocals and guitar)
Alyssa chose to major in agricultural communications with the aspiration of redefining agriculture. She wants to help consumers understand the scope of the industry and create a proactive view of agriculture through marketing, communications and public relations.
4 thermodynamic
9:57 PM – Up next, Alberto Del Rio, Chris Jericho and his Lite Brite Jacket will take on Randy Orton and Sheamus in some Tag Team action. Orton and Del Rio kick things off. The beginning fo the match is fast paced, and control teeters between the teams. As we go to commercial break, Del Rio and Jericho begin to dominate, however.
A young man doffed his baseball cap
Me:" Yes, what do you want?"
On April 30, 1958, the court rendered judgment finding, inter alia that on January 17, 1956, petitioner Eco obtained from the Bureau of Forestry a certificate of private wood-land registration under Section 1829 of the Revised Administrative Code, on the strength of a possessory information title covering 700 hectares but which was made to appear later on a sketch to contain 290 hectares of forest land, 99 hectares of are logged area and 811 hectares cultivated area; TigMan Lumber Co., another timber licensee, protested against this registration and filed a petition for reconsideration which was apparently granted because the Director of Forestry suspended the operation of Eco’s certificate; that likewise, it was found that portions of the area released from the forest zone were under occupancy by some 80 oppositors; that after a series of protests and counter-protests, objections and counter-objections between the parties, the Director of Forestry recommended cancellation of Eco’s certificate of private woodland and the Secretary of Agriculture & Natural Resources approved the recommendation; that upon the appeal of Eco, the Secretary reopened the case and ordered a formal investigation of the whole controversy to give the parties “ample opportunity to formally present their respective sides of the controversy and (be) given their ‘day in court’”; that petitioner Eco refused to submit to this, reinvestigation, insisting that it was not necessary; that in the face of this attitude of Eco, the Secretary of Agriculture & Natural Resources issued a decision, the pertinent part of which reads:
This kit is packed with "sew" many wonderful items, both new and old. Here are a few hints. If you like vintage, you will love this kit! If you like fabric, you will love this kit! And if you like color, you will love this kit! Oh, heck, everyone is going to love this kit...
-Bill Richardson
We can disguise that by threading the cord through a series of Command hooks placed along the back of the table, and down the leg. Make sure your hooks are smaller than the table legs so they don't poke out.
It was a production of some of Alain Boubill and Claude-Michel Schonburg's musicals. Now, if you're a musical geek like me, those names mean a lot to you. They're the men who brought us Les Mis and Miss Saigon, among others.
“New problems,” Tanner gave Hood a no-nonsense look. “Different problems. We got people starting to wander in our direction.”
So once I had the bottle/jacket combo established, I was off to the races. I could easily smuggle my oversized cocktail anywhere. One one of my favorites places to do so was the student movies, where alcohol was not permitted, but somehow always managed to be in abundance.** It worked great in a bunch of other situations too, and if I got caught (which I never did, by the way), I could just toss the bottle. My net loss would have been a couple bucks worth of booze and a drinking vessel I could replace at the nearest Speedy Mart.
It will be a busy 3 months ahead with the planning for our wedding, house and honeymoon (we are going to Europe, all thanks to cheap fares!) , but it sure is exciting! Will update again on our invites, which my friend have nicely drawn up for us =)
This week on Through The Looking Glass I will be playing the whole of the Beatles “Sgt Peppers” in cover versions, Using cover songs to expose the poetry hidden in songs that you know and love. There will be a few covers sang by Tom Jones, My featured cover artist this week. I will also throw in a few seasonally inspired covers and remixes to prepare you for the holiday onslaught.
January 20th @ 6:30 in my studio. Class fee is $20.00. Let me know if your interested in attending.
Enough of this game, most malicious mistress.
"Let's make a toad house!" I said to Lizzie and "YEAH!" was her immediate enthusiastic reply. I rummaged through a pile of old clay pots, found a hammer and we smashed a side off each pot and had instant toad homes.
Turnip
He keeps barking at me, like he is trying to tell me something, and wanting me to pick him up.
My sister eventually joined me when she came here for her college education. Those were some of the happiest years of my life. My sister and I share an intimate bond that I think … no, that I know will last forever. And yes, Rudeboy, I know forever's an awfully long time. Such a word isn't to be taken lightly.
Center for Army Leadership, The US Army Leadership Field Manual (New York: McGraw-Hill, 2004).
If for nothing else, go for the amazing embossed wallpaper. So beautiful.
If it’s a muscle strain or just general neck stiffness, a few handy tools like the pocket physio or the spiky ball can help. All you need is a wall and you can use those tools to find the exact spot if it’s a trigger point or just use the spiky ball to roll out over the general area where your muscles are tight. A tennis ball or lacrosse ball works just as well. You can even roll out your upper back on the foam roller and that’s quite nice too. Don’t spend too long on it – just 15 minutes will be enough.
Well, that certainly sounds like an academic argument! It is, until you look at some of Traditional Fantasy of the pre-Tolkien era. It’s remarkable, and obviously different from High Fantasy. In Traditional Fantasy, illogical and impossible things happen all the time, but we don’t question them. They fit the psychology of the situation, after all. The dreamy sense of being transported to another kind of existence is the hallmark of Traditional Fantasy-and explains why stories such as the Arthurian Legend have remained popular, not just for years, but for centuries.
But if this kind of thing appeals to you, rest assured that there are some wickedly funny one-liners sprinkled throughout, and that Linda Lavin is the expected force of nature as the gleefully selfish matriarch.
Prepare and complete journal entries by compiling and analyzing source data associated with the assigned areas of responsibility
the sublating of silence that occurs
Description: Jessie Brazen fell hard for Victor Weatherly, hard enough to marry him during a short whirlwind romance. Then everything fell apart and he left. Now, after a three year separation, Jessie decides the best thing for everyone involved is to let him go, forever. After all, it’s not like anyone knows they’re married, except her sister, Samantha. So she writes to him, demanding a divorce. Victor isn’t about to let his wife go without a fight. So they had issues, everyone does, but he knows if she will just hear him out, he can prove they belong together.
Not only words to live by...
Oh! I guess it was me who disappeared. Ooops.
But, I am back to doing that fabric thing again. Here are a couple of my notepad organizers that are on Etsy. I made them using the fabric and paper strips challenge that Alisha and I did a while back. If you would like to try it yourself, just go back in my blog and you can find it. Since (my bad) I am not keeping up here very well, you won't have far to go to find it.
First of all, I just want to wish a belated Happy Mother's Day to all the mothers out there. I had a decent day. Very quiet, nothing stressful and I didn't even have to cook!
This could be a good way to use the equity in your property. The Sales Market across the country continues to struggle whilst most specialist property management companies are experiencing steady growth.
Describe Yourself: Long-time Pet Owner
Accessories: liquid pearls, EK success border punch, Spellbinders Fancy Labels, ribbon from stash, hat pins, sponger, corner chomer and photo corner punch, embossing folder from tim holtz and dimensionals
The weekend was one I had been anticipating for awhile. It was going to be crazy and fun and way busy, but I knew we could get through it with lots of smiles!! Thankfully, we did!
I also think that experiencing Munson's work directly must provoke many memories in relation to childhood and youth, and to that almost infantile sensation we feel in when we come across objects that arouse internal mechanisms of need, demand, and desire.
Artists
I had so much fun with this card and image. Isn't he handsome?!! I used a lot of Liquid Applique and was hoping for a chilly effect. hee hee I love my Silhouette lamp post and added crackle for a vintage effect. I also used the new Christmas paper from Graphic 45 called Christmas Emporium collection.
Let Every Bad Memory Go
“So if he doesn’t play anymore, I’d like to see him be part of the team in some way or function.”
The YMCA building itself didn’t last a lot longer. Around 1909 it was replaced by the Astor Hotel. We hadn’t realised until we posted here that the Astor took the 1890 building and remodelled it for hotel use.
No matter how depressed or how elated or tired you feel, do not skip any meal. Skipping a meal is not going to make you feel better in any way.Instead you are going to feel more depressed and tired. Try to eat what will make you feel better.But that does not meal you can eat a pack of your favorite biscuit for breakfast and a plum cake for lunch.Choose the right food and have a nutritious snack in between.
It is amazing how quick we are to judge and condemn the world around us and yet we shy away from accepting what truly needs to change within us. What we see around us is nothing but a reflection of what is within us. If we do not have insecurity within us then we would not be bothered by insecurity because our vibrations would not match and therefore won’t allow that match.
Downloads stagnated for a bit. I had never really liked the cover for Translations, but it was the best I could do at the time. I kept playing around with Paint.net though and began formulating a better idea. Then I stumbled across the perfect piece of art for it and it all came together beautifully. Everything else got repackaged after that so they didn't look like cheap cousins beside Translations.
I love to wear sweaters in the wintertime because they are easy to layer and really keep you warm. Wear a bright orange or coral colored sweater with jeans and a pair of boots, and you’ll be toasty warm.
23.Rev. Rice & Congregation / Leaving All To Follow Jesus
Like some married women,
Chocolate, unsweetened (1 square/ounce) - 3 T unsweetened cocoa + 1 T shortening, butter or oil
In the past week Zach and I got pre-qualified and have since been house hunting like nobody's business. We are super excited to announce that we found ' the one' I don't want to say too much, in case I jinx it, but here are the facts. Facts don't jinx, right?
Vegetable salad
First black politician elected to office in Russia
were opened just a bit?
I am an athletic supporter! I LOVE college football (GO BOISE STATE!) and really enjoyed going to any type of sporting event in school. I love soccer. However, I am not a big athlete. NOPE! Even when I was younger and loved soccer, throwing a baseball, and if I do say so myself- had a killer serve in volleyball- I was never what I would consider an "athlete."
I've also made my final pair but haven't got a photo of them, yet. They are bright yellow with lemons on them. I mean, you didn't expect me to make sensible shorts did you?
For Valentine’s day, I’ve picked the classic novel by Emily Brontë, “Wuthering Heights”. This is one of the most powerful love stories ever written, where love is front and center, even after death.
That’s right, I’m turning to my readers. I don’t have a lot of subscribers yet, because this blog has only been around for a few weeks, but I still need the few that I have! I’m running out of ideas to post about. So, let me know what you guys are interested in?
The Indigency Program application is available online by visiting www.txsurchargeonline.com or calling the toll-free number 1-800-688-6882 and selecting option 7. Easy-to-read instructions are also included with the application.
After overwhelming myself by trying to remember and match After School members’ names and faces (still mixing between JooYeon and Lizzy though), I decided to turn to something soft, soothing, with the faces I have enough confidence with. Love, Hate was the choice.
I was frustrated that it was taking so much work to train him to suck, but the lactation consultant reminded me, "He hasn't been able to move his tongue out of his mouth for 9 months. It's going to take more than a few days to teach him to use it properly to nurse." The next day, I noticed Kyle was actually sucking and swallowing while at the breast, so I started massaging the breast while he was nursing to encourage the milk out and his swallowing per suck ratio increased dramatically. He was still requiring about an ounce of additional expressed human milk after nursing most of the time, but this was major progress. At three months, Kyle is now nursing totally independent of any supplements, and only occasionally requires adjustment of his sucking.
"Hi Patrick. Will it be the usual large coffee with cream and sugar, and two sugar-coated jelly donuts." I said,
When I receive queries that claim to be literary fiction, it often turns out, after reading the synopsis, that they are for genre fiction (aka commercial fiction). The flip side has happened too. I request a supernatural thriller or dark mystery and they turn out to be much more literary than the author probably realized.
Who names a revolution? Is it the pundits, the journalists or the revolutionaries themselves? Ukraine's Orange Revolution. The Green Revolution in Iran.
Santa Claus Is Comin' to Town ... ABC Family ... 11:30 AM
Muse: Are you rich?
evening mists rising now, tranquil.
There was a weird little cabinet, counter with mirror,
of Bob Marley's (her Daddy) song and created this touching
For the time being, AFRICOM will be based in Stuttgart, with covert intelligence operatives working out of US installations and front companies throughout Africa.
And stain my favours in a bloody mask,
Love paranormal romance, werewolves and ethereal spirits? Then this book is for you! From Amazon UK
G.R. No. G.R. No. 173775 October 8, 2008
I also managed to find time to make a batch of dandelion wine. This is very time consuming to pick all of the blossoms but well worth it.
It was great to do something different for this challenge. I hope you get chance to join us for this challenge.
What's really behind these cute gushy photos? Real life as a mom.
Your turn. Have you had a similar situation where you were able to help out a client or potential client in a way you didn’t expect? How did it work out?
“That’s a sign of economic vitality, something that’s good for the borough,” said Joe DePlasco, the Ratner spokesman. In other words, the project has successfully removed the blight that was the justification for eminent domain.
For many of us, all we had left was independence, not content with the other offerings upon the nationalist table we drifted away taking our number with us and many, too many to relate walked away from nationalism realising that in such a climate it was finished, the battle now individual and the danger immense. For those like myself it was and indeed is an appalling state of affairs, never in living memory has the people not had a defence, never have the forces of malignancy held such sway, uncontested and indeed approaching triumph. For us it was the BNP who had altered course to such a level that they had presented the same threat as conservative populists, Tory duplicity forming the bulk of its argument or the growing Front where Judaic created sectarianism hypnotised many, indeed this left even less for those of a nationalistic bent after considering and rejecting the two above.
it was about a demon named rin who has been collecting beautiful body parts for his body. one day, he sees a girl named miwako play the piano and asks her to give him her hands. then she promises to give them to him after she plays the accompaniment for a wedding.
Jackie: “Love Is” was the first song we wrote and it has been recorded three times now! I mentioned earlier that we recorded it again for the debut album, but the tempo wasn’t exactly how we wanted it, so we recorded it again for “This Grand Show” and we got a chance to treat it very differently. Because it appears as a dream in the narrative we wanted to shake it up a bit and make it stand out as the most hopeful and happy song on the album. So, we ran the vocals through a Leslie and treated the instruments differently to give it a nostalgic feel. I’m not sure if we have any more old songs that are not released. Well, ‘The West,’ which is on a 7” split with friends Giant Squid may get re-released at some point. Currently, it is only available on that 7” record.
I: To go to the beginning, how did you discover punk?
There are four other special elections around New York State today, which means that fully 30 percent of the members of the Senate and the Assembly will have been selected not through a primary process, but through getting the nod of the county party. Since so many districts are heavily Republican or heavily Democratic, this means that a substantial number of lawmakers get into office without ever having been properly vetted by the voters. And since it is so difficult to beat
In graduate school I developed great friendships with two very important women. One was a light-skinned black women who was a naturalized Jamaican. Her mother had been a maid for white families. When she was 10, she came to America. She gave nobody any excuses for not getting educated and held herself to high standards. She taught me poverty was a circumstance; being educated was a choice. I consider this woman my ‘twin’ separated at birth and it is unfortunate we are a few shades off in skin color or we could pass this way!
This was just too funny/strange not to write about. This morning, just as Isaac woke up and we were laying in bed snuggling he started talking nonsense. I realized he was telling me about his dream. He kept going on and on and I could tell it was very real to him. Here's what he told me:
Welcome to Trenton, New Jersey, home to wiseguys, average Joes, and Stephanie Plum, who sports a big attitude and even bigger money problems (since losing her job as a lingerie buyer for a department store). Stephanie needs cash—fast—but times are tough, and soon she’s forced to turn to the last resort of the truly desperate: family...
I ordered these black Celine clog replica shoes from Lovely E-Gallery in late April 2011, along with a number of other items (shoes & apparel). The process took about a month and I received my shoes in late May 2011. Everything else in my order was fine (except for another pair of shoes where you could see the guidelines for the cut outs on the material of the shoes), however, I received my clog platforms in a pretty disgusting condition.
13 Do you fast or severely restrict your food intake?
There have also been splits with bands Timeshares and Spraynard, but those are much harder to come by. In fact, the last made CWS/Spraynard split was sold at the December 23rd Christmas Show in Scranton.
Web: Use the Google Earth plug-in to explore a 3D globe with Earth view in Google Maps and on sites across the web.
We’ve got 3-6 months before we’re standing in line at Gamestop to pick up our copies of Mists of Pandaria. It sounds like a long time, but in Warcraft time, it’s not really. What are you doing to pass the time until we’re rolling our monks?
2. AVOID CUTTING YOURSELF WHEN SLICING VEGETABLES BY GETTING SOMEONE ELSE TO HOLD THE VEGETABLES WHILE YOU CHOP.
"Belle" (Beauty and the Beast) (Menken/Ashman)
Jeff Andrews – The idea of “the big picture” has always fascinated and interested me so in that respect design has always been a part of my life. My first professional interior design experience was with my now good friend Eleanor Mondale. She hired me to “style” a recently purchased home and I ended up designing the entire house. It was an a-ha moment for me for sure. Through the process with her, and her encouragement and trust, I found the courage to trust my design sense and aesthetic and pursue it as a career. We have since worked on homes in New York, South Hampton and Minnesota. Not bad for a rookie!
No matter: facts, logic, history and reason never get between the Left and their master plans.
The tragic error that so many make is to imagine that they are, in fact, completely individual. They would divorce themselves from the community that surrounds them. They would have no responsibility for the community, and the community would have no responsibility for them. What they imagine is not even possible.
You know what the big secret about TED is? . . . This is like the failure conference. No, it is. You know why this place is amazing? Because very few people here are afraid to fail. And no one who gets on stage, so far that I've seen, has not failed. I've failed miserably, many times. The key is still to try hard things, even knowing that you might fail, but then learning from it. So the first video is from TED Fellow Myshkin Ingawale. It's a little over 6 minutes, so please take the time to watch it. The important point to realize is that he built this device - and it failed. So then he built it 32 more times until it worked. After watching this video, think how important his invention is and how many times he had to "fail" to get a working version.
Income Till Payday Allows When You Want Cash
In this manner, a relationship cannot be one way; both parties must continue to work together to keep the relationship going. Differences must be reconciled or they will lead to separation. When a wrong is done, atonement must take place for the relationship to continue properly. Consequently, atonement is a crucial part of any relationship.
"Did she really just say what I think she said?" I wondered, but decided that since it was late and she really needed to go to sleep, I would not pursue such a deep conversation right then. I remained silent.
That we die before our time.
I was flying from America to UK with a proofed copy of my book to read on the plane, and the chap across the aisle from me said, “Excuse me, I see you’re reading Wilbur Smith?” And I said, “Yes, I read all his books… I love Wilbur Smith.” He replied, “I’m glad to hear that as he’s one of my closest friends, I’ll tell you what, if you give me a card, next time I see Wilbur I’ll get him to sign a book for you.”
A fierce blaze broke out at the derelict Carville Hotel in the early hours of Friday the 30th of April.
Thus, it can be concluded that though it takes a longer time, chronic sinus infections can be cured. However, one thing needs to be kept in mind – if not treated properly, it can relapse!
* lightly cream the margarine and the sugar. add the eggs and beat well. pour in the pineapple and it's juice, blend well. fold in the cubed bread.sprinkle lightly with cinnamon. bake at 350 F. in a greased casserole dish until golden. YUM!!
Today we have a fabby sketch made by the wonderful Corry.
What do you think of the finalists this season? Were you as sad as I was to see Jamar go? Do you think Adam should have split his points differently?
Inflation seems to be getting worse because of our laid back attitude. We’re taking little action because we can’t seem to acknowledge how bad it is. Here’s a quote from Channel NewsAsia:
Social media madness has reached the point where the best idea is no idea.
1 3/4 cups White Whole Wheat or Whole Wheat pastry flour (alternately you could use all purpose)
Coriander futures escalated on improved demand scenario. Spot prices in Kota traded near 4200 per quintal and arrivals were reported near 3000 bags. Total arrivals were reported at 13000 bags. Usual arrivals season starts from February and extend till May end. Total carry over stocks has been estimated 25-30 lakh bags. As per trade sources estimation, production is expected around of 60-65 lakh bags due to lower acreage of cultivation. Erratic weather condition during the sowing period had decreased the acreage under cultivation.
As I celebrate my third Mother's Day this year, I am thankful everyday that God gave me the opportunity to become a mother. It is by far the best thing I have ever done with my life. It has fulfilled me in ways I never knew possible and taught me to love unconditionally. It has brought a love so powerful into my life it sometimes moves me to tears. It has given my life a new purpose and taught me to be selfless and that the world does not indeed revolve around me. Sterling is the light of my life and I am so darn proud to be his mother. It is not easy and all you Mothers know that. We have the toughest job in the world that most days goes unappreciated. So to all you Moms and especially to my Mom, Happy Mothers Day you deserve a day dedicated to you. Now its time to drink wine while the dads watch the kids (haha- if only that were true in my house).
There were five main characters: Kami, of course, Jared, Ash, and Holly. Each were a separate entity and while they seemed a little caricature-ish, I loved them all. The best part about books like this one is observing a wily cast of unlikely friends trying to solve a mystery together. It happens a lot in this genre, as well as zombie media, so it's something I always look forward to reading.
Staying with the West’s modern-day Hurons and Zande; one shudders to think what other moral atrocities Mandela would’ve condoned (or committed), hadn’t he been locked up for 27 years during the life-or-death Cold War struggle between the freedom of the individual and the integrity of the collective. It suffices to say that Mandela’s claim to fame is just another feel good ‘time-capsule’ which, like the 500-year old myth itself, feeds on the hope of the West to find redemption for perennial ‘sins’ committed in the name of human advancement. Leading from the front is always an incredibly lonely and ungrateful task – something the West is only starting to realize now that its accomplishments are under siege. Nearly everybody has the A-bomb now and the export of our morality (e.g. human rights, democracy, etc) is increasingly running into civilizational tariff barriers we arrogantly assumed would not be in place anymore, given the progressive example we have set.
Do we simply relive life, over and over again, without the knowledge that this has all happened before?
7. Striking
Now when it is cooked and drained throw in a lump of butter. Yes I know it's supposedly bad for you but nothing tastes quite like it. Now just do it. It's wonderful. Trust me.
If you haven't seen it please see the link below for the most exciting ten minutes you can have in front of a computer.
Cinelli logos (new style) embossed on bar and stem, fork crown,
For the modern day superhero team, it has its beginning back in the Golden age of comic books. Superman, Batman and Robin frequently teamed up on the pages of World’s Finest Comics, and The Man of Steel and the Dark Knight were given honorary membership into the Justice Society of America alongside Wonder Woman, The Specter, and the Golden age versions of such characters as The Flash, Green Lantern, Hawkman, Red Tornado, Black Canary and Dr. Fate. Timely Comics (now called Marvel) had something similar with the All-Star Squadron that consisted of Captain America, Bucky, Namor the Submariner, The Golden Age version of Human Torch, and a number of other characters that slipped into oblivion. In many of these adventures the heroes would be taking on various spies from the Axis Superpowers, saving the world from these dreaded foes. In many ways bringing together these heroes reflected what was going on in the world with Great Britain, Russia, and the United States joining forces with each other to take on the forces of Hitler, Hirohito, and Mussolini.
(12) David Smith
There is an amazing history involving Australia regarding the Transit of Venus and it won’t be happening again in our lifetime.
So after gnashing your teeth and banging your head on the wall and weeping NO NO NO NO into your bloodied palms, the thing to do is to start again.
Time to refocus.
“While I was waiting for them to get the horse off me, I was thinking, ‘Casey Tibbs, you son-of-a-buck,” he said.
Kari: We’ve heard there are a few cameos of characters from Tell Me a Secret in Don’t Breathe a Word. Are the rumors true? What can you tell us about them? Does Delaney really show up in DBAW? I wanna know about that chick.
you stand up for yourself
Tagliatale made with squid ink then dressed in a sauce of chopped squid braised in its own ink. It tasted the way a pot full of steaming clams or mussels smells when you take the lid off. I thoroughly enjoyed every single mouth blackening and grimey bite. Probably my favorite pasta dish of the trip.
Don’t forget “Orgies for Abstinence V” on Friday!
Consider the following: A man is attacked by a bird and the fracas causes such a commotion that the informant he was meeting gets spooked and runs, leaving the man without the super secret code to the safe he was about to break into in order to steal back his wife's prize poodle. Now the stupid bird has elevated our poor protagonist's problem. No informant, no code, no poodle, and a wife on the verge of divorce.
Cue Explosion!
The greater preference for energy production over environmental protection in recent years likely results from the economic downturn, given that Americans have made economic matters their highest priority. There was a brief exception in the spring of 2010, however, after the Gulf of Mexico oil spill brought environmental issues back to the forefront.
15 Then Esther bade them return Mordecai this answer, 16 Go, gather together all the Jews that are present in Shushan, and fast ye for me, and neither eat nor drink three days, night or day: I also and my maidens will fast likewise; and so will I go in unto the king, which is not according to the law: and if I perish, I perish.
Natural incretins are very short-lived, which is why the GLP-1 agonist drugs are not quite the same as the human versions - they have been designed to hang around a bit longer. GLP-1 is broken down in the body by an enzyme called DPP-4, and a class of drugs called gliptins inhibit the activity of DPP-4, thus preventing the breakdown of GLP-1 and increasing its availability in the body. Gliptins can be taken as tablets, which gives them an advantage over injectable incretins.
But that took years, even decades before the public rehabilitation of former presidents. Bush is getting the historical pass barely two years out of office. The colossal giveaways to the corporate rich and Wall Street, a failed, flawed, and absolutely unnecessary war, a bungled Katrina response, off the chart sex, and corruption scandals within the GOP, a tanked economy, and a general clueless, governing incompetence that defied political belief have seemingly vanished from public and historical view faster than a Houdini disappearing act. The disappearance doesn’t totally explain why so many now pine for a return of Bush over Obama. Bush has rally done nothing to deserve this nostalgia, and history has certainly not absolved him, let alone vindicated him of, his colossal policy failures.
There has been a constant attack against truly Catholic institutions of learning. I spoke with Adam Wilson who is with the Cardinal Newman Society, and he verified that The Newman Guide, which they thoroughly research for each year, lists the universities that follow the Magesterium. For the list Click Here. This is the most current list, and for me in particular will be very helpful while getting my high school freshman daughter ready for upcoming college searches.
In the first chapter of Acts there were only eleven disciples. Judas had betrayed Jesus Christ leading to His crucifixion but then, in great remorse, he committed suicide. So a serious problem was at hand: there had to be twelve apostles. Jesus chose twelve. He promised that these twelve would sit on twelve thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. (Matthew 19:28). Before the Kingdom could be offered there had to be twelve disciples or apostles. According to Acts 1:14 they had spent days in prayer. Not a simple, brief prayer meeting, but days spent in prayer. A disciple had to be a follower and had to have followed the Lord from His baptism until the day He was taken up from them. A replacement had to be found in order to fulfil the Old Testament prophecy. Peter, the spokesman, quoted from Psalm 69:25 and said,
The atmosphere of conflict in Jerusalem continues to intensify with a further attempt to discredit Jesus, this time by the Sadducees with a contrived hypothetical scenario of one woman marrying 7 brothers (possibly taken from a similiar story in the book of Tobit). Their point is that the Mosaic law has been literally fulfilled, their implication that the idea of resurrection is thus proved absurd.
1923-1997
More importantly, from beginning to end, von Sternberg repeatedly makes the point that Sophia doesn't make any of her own choices. Early in the film, we watch Sophia's routine on entering her own parlor: she curtsies and kisses the hands of no fewer than seven people before speaking. Seven curtsies, seven kisses—and then one more, once she is introduced to Count Alessi. When she leaves the room (after being told that she's travelling to Russia to be married), von Sternberg makes us watch the same ritual, in reverse. Her every action is circumscribed by ritual, and by decisions that were made for her. When she does seize the crown, it's because her husband is insane and his mistress has promised her a shaved head and a trip to a convent. Aristotle would say that's a misadventure, not a tragedy. I say it's an inverted world, a mirror version of fairy tales and costume dramas.
My contention is that with a more traditional style of architecture it would look even more impressive. The individual buildings often make use of fine geometrical shapes and the Lowry Gallery has semi circles . In themselves these geometric shapes are attractive but they bear no relation to the inspiration for the building nor its function. If you walk through a historic town like Shrewsbury you have the finest Tudor street in England. When you turn the corner you come upon different periods but they are united and in harmony. Contemporary buildings are individual and not in harmony with their neighbours.
You will need: Canvas bag (I bought a pack of 3 from Michaels and I bought the white color)
Though simple enough it was to me really tough the ground needs to be fed,
I used the "It's Valentines" stamp set from K. Andrew Designs. Remember that Kristal's stamps are made here in the USA and that a portion of the proceeds from each set is donated to charity. You can purchase this great set of stamps by clicking on the image below.
I was checking my Heartomatic a lil bit ago and found out this bad boy has been featured in the Gift Guides! YAY! But wait, which one? The GAG GIFT GUIDE! Why you ask? Seems like a harmless little jar candle right? Wrong..this is why...
the following areas:
Executive producer Ken Mok said in a statement: “Nigel Barker, Jay Manuel and J. Alexander have been an integral part of the ‘America’s Next Top Model’ brand and they helped turn this show into the household name it is today. They have been amazing assets to the show and will always be a part of the ‘Top Model’ family. We will continue to actively work with each of them on future projects.”
One of the most distracting things for me is to be reading a novel and suddenly read a passage that is factually incorrect. Last night I wrote several paragraphs on my NaNo story. During the night several questions about Corvettes went through my head, such as “Do they have spare tires?” Any Corvette owner knows that I discovered that they don’t.
In previous articles the present writer has pointed out that Malhotra’s use of the ancient Hindu method of argument, Purva Paksha, is a truncated one, which stops short of “defeating” the adversary’s positions, and in fact aims at appeasing the adversary. Adi Shankara’s Digvijay tours of India (where he used Purva Paksha) were aimed at defeating the enemy in argument, not in appeasing him/her. Malhotra’s use of the word “dialogue” (a Platonic one) is also misleading. Socrates, in the Platonic Dialogues, aims at peeling off the layers of ignorance of his adversary’s arguments and arriving at what he believes to be the truth (See “Rajiv Malhotra & Francis Clooney: The siren song of interfaith dialogue”) . While Mr. Malhotra is entitled to his own interpretations, they become misleading for Hindus, when they are projected as the way to approach a clear and present danger, the predatory proselytising agenda of the Catholic Church.
— Give voice to the voiceless; official and unofficial sources of information can be equally valid.
So you mess it up by just feeling up someone.
265 2. “‘To Amend’ Means ‘To Improve.’” Congressional Record, vol. 141, pp. E739-E740, March 30, 1995. (Entered by Representative Patsy T. Mink.) See, Item C-2003(2) , below, pp. 833-34, n. 346. See, also, Item E-IV/22/1995, below.
The arrival of The Beast was genuinely the greatest “how are they going to get out of this one” moments in the show. The seemed to really ramp up the action and stunts in this episode as well.
Wednesday, March 30 - Somerville Theater - Boston, MA
“Are you sure we should put the kids in one of those things? I mean, how do we know it’s safe?”
Did I threaten them within an inch of their recess? No!
1: No nukes
Time to move on to the fun stuff!
In my branch of the industry, we were more about selling products immediately (think food dehydrators, miracle knife sets, or inflatable beds) rather than merely providing brand awareness for a client. This involved a need for toll-free phone numbers to appear in the ads which involved a need for large telemarketing facilities to handle the call volume. This meant more paperwork.
After work on Saturday, I took 2 buses to get home, and then I called my cousin for our weekly quality movie theater time. We didn’t decide on what we were watching, til she surprisingly picked up her long-time-no-see friend. They both decided to watch The Hunger Games, which I reluctantly agreed to, since my cousin hasn’t seen her friend in a while and I didn’t feel like complicating things.
65 Count of Monte Cristo – Alexandre Dumas
Late in the afternoon, I heard back from my Oncologist. My CT scan has been moved forward to next Wednesday and a bone scan has been booked for Monday May 3rd. I then have an appointment with the Oncologist to review the results on May 11th.
In the 2005 business year, which ran from 7/1/05 to 6/30/06, DDDB raised $199,454 in direct public support, spent $102,599 in program services and $33,386 in fundraising, and had $55,072 left over.
A friend was getting married, but another friend was in the process of getting a divorce.
Forget that we have not done anything to reverse the decision of the fascists on the Supreme Court who unleashed unlimited corporate money into politics (including our own pockets). Forget the fact that, after promising to make decisions based on science rather than ideology, we have only intensified the War on (some) Drugs and acquiesced in the release of corporate-designed, corporate-profiting, dangerous genetically modified organisms into the biosphere. Forget the fact that, at every turn, we have done more to bail out the wealthy than to offer real assistance to the hard pressed. To sum it up, forget how little, besides public perception, really changed when the reins of power passed from Cheney to Obama–vote for us, because we support same-sex marriage and your right to an abortion, and the Republicans don’t.”
NOW.
I am impossibly sore. I love it. I love post run healthy soreness. I love sore achy muscles after a good lift. I love the tired legs after a great spin workout. Some soreness is good for you, it lets you know that things are getting done in your body. Nothing wrong with that. But I would love to be able to take the time to relieve all that soreness and let it go with a nice long massage, so that I can feel fresh for maybe one day. To be able to get the tactile muscle soreness release and feel the comfort of your body just letting go of its exercise stiffness and soreness. I have never had a massage. I am always jealous of people getting the post endurance race massages. I am jealous of all the friends who I know who have had deep tissue massages and talked about them in the most spectacular terms. I would really like one but I cant afford one.
my levelheadedness.
Afterwards, I asked him what made him decide to go for it. He said, "Because I know how much you've always wanted to play with a symphony orchestra, Mom." It's true; that was always a dream of mine. Did my dream come true last Wednesday? Close enough!
It's just another manic Monday
This was the sky when I woke up on Saturday, which didn't bode well for the race I was supposed to run in an hour...
** rinsing the dried chillies and Sichuan peppercorns, helps to release the flavour better (IMO) and also prevent them from burning too quickly.
I’ve given you all your dreams
At this time Dennis called out because the mahatma had passed him by with both the opening of the third eye as well as the music. He whined and looked and acted like a little boy who was being picked on. The mahatma grilled him for maybe ten minutes to the point where Dennis was literally groveling in front of the mahatma begging him for the knowledge. Finally the mahatma reluctantly gave in and dispensed the guru’s knowledge to what I would now call the American untouchable, Dennis.
‘You know you’re borderline when you feel suicidal over a small incident because you just feel emotional pain so much more than non-BP’s and the only thing that could make it stop is killing yourself.’ (Sharon Howard)
My husband does yard work, tree trimming, and pool work on the side. He has been doing this a number of years and now has a website to advertise his company, JBGrasscutter.
-1. "When you think it is impossible....just remember someone invented Popcorn Jelly Beans that really tast like Popcorn" ~ John Mayer
1. Mama Voula's Spanakopita
THE HOUSE OF THE DEAD 4 GOLDMAN AVATAR – 4/17
I told Becca to order my usual and I would be there before they even realized I was gone. So as I am cruising over, a cop was coming the other way over a bridge and turned his lights before I even past him. What the?! Can they even do that? I guess there is a first for everything. I quickly sent out a distress text to Becca telling her that I was just pulled over. The officer ended up giving me a ticket for 14 over, which may or may not have been pretty generous considering the fact that I was clocked going 28 over... Then he thanked me for wearing my seat belt and how much he appreciated it. Jokes on you copper, I flung my seat belt on while you were pulling your kamikaze u-turn maneuver to pull me over - Its the little victories that keep me going.
During my last year in Guatemala I took the majority of my students on hikes up La Muela, my favorite hike in Xela.
she spent the night at the prom
Once we got there, we decided to just look at it.
Chanel Perfection Lumière in B20 (under eyes)
(Georgetown University) Thomas Boggs. One of the clients of
his wife, she's that wife that decorates on the 4th of july
(10) there is evidence of frequent infection with viruses, especially herpesvirus and enteroviruses.
I share this story with you for two reasons:
When Patrick came home from work the next day, he came to me with a notebook. He started to write down his prayers. This would become a lifeline for him in the following days, weeks and months.
This year we decided to take a little outing to see Cars 2 and out to dinner but nothing much else for the 1st. I did however manage to make some yummy Nanaimo bars for tomorrow to throw in a little taste of home. I made these a time or two, every time with a new recipe. This year I think I found a keeper! They taste rather close to the real thing!! I found it here. I made a few adjustments-
bake 350 for 45 min to 1 hour
5:30-- Get up feeling very well rested.
I seen her, Miss!
In Invisible Fiends, the humour comes from the dialogue between the two main characters. It’s mostly quite droll, deadpan stuff, which contrasts with the elaborate nature of the situations they keep finding themselves thrust into.
Yet, it’s as if my skills have vanished into some sort of Bermuda Triangle that swallows up the silver-thatched and wrinkle-skinned. My resume is, apparently, as worthless as last week’s losing lotto ticket.
I then hear a gurgling voice calling me. He’s only upchucking all over the sofa now. It doesn’t land in the middle, it pebble-dashes the entire barfing sofa. I cry and aaaack as I watch it trickle between the cushion seats.
I love potatoes. I often get into a rut, making them the same way over and over again – mashed, in stews, etc. A few weeks ago, I wanted to do something a little more with a potato side dish, and I came across this wonderful recipe for Spanish Potatoes with Chorizo in a recipe book from Australia called “The Cook’s Companion” by Stephanie Alexander. This book actually weighs 2.5 kg (nearly 6 lbs), and has a million (not really, but close) recipes in it. It’s not a book for the faint-hearted, but it has some great recipes and ideas, so when I am bored with the “same old same old”, I often take it off the shelf (carefully) and I always find something interesting to cook.
Odette Yustman is not working with her best script, but even so, her performance in And Soon the Darkness is painful to watch. Yustman does a much more acceptable job in The Unborn, where she is playing a character that seems to fit her personality better: chilled, subdued, and vulnerable. In And Soon the Darkness, Yustman is trying her hardest to play a wild, crazy, sexual being, and this character doesn’t come as naturally to her. To make up for her lack of experience in this type of role, Yustman resorts to playing stereotypes and clichés, and looks uncomfortable on screen. Further inflating the problem, writers Jennifer Derwingson and Marcos Efron make the character of Ellie dislikable. So not only is Yustman fighting against her miscasting, but she is also trying to win back the audience, who will most likely be rooting against her by the second act of the film. As an example, in the opening scene, Ellie is shown leaving her friend for a sexual encounter, and even hitting on a guy that Stephanie is interested in. These are both terrible character traits, and they leave the audience rooting against Ellie. A poorly written character, mixed with Yustman’s amateurish performance, makes Ellie an awkward and uncomfortable character to watch.
Well, once again, I'm finally writing on the ol' blog and it isn't the greatest of news. This last Tues. I found out I have Thyroid Cancer but let me start at the beginning...
Council Member James has been an active voice— along with much of the Progressive Caucus— on achieving living wage in New York City.
“Mrs. Archer, I doubt the gaseous eruptions are ferric in nature. What does he eat?”
Anon
Our friend Brenda had found two caterpillars in her garden, and passed them along to Corinne and Audie. Audie's didn't make it, but Corinne's thrived, and made himself into a little cocoon! I remember watching this process in elementary school, but I guess as an adult I appreciate it a lot more.
So it’s not surprising that… fans are surprised with this sudden cancellation. Or supposed cancellation of a very popular anime. Crunchyroll reported,
The onerous implications have some members of the media here feeling under more pressure than at any time since the fall of apartheid.
"You know how that turned out last time, Dad. Maybe you should make them poisonous"
5. Michelob Ultra
Cole has worked with L’Oreal Paris since 2009 promoting many of their hair products, the latest being in May for their Elnett hairspray.
We went back to Jockey Club this morning and cancelled. (Yes on a Sunday. We didn't want to risk them saying the 5 days really meant 24 hours or something.) It was suprisingly easy to cancel and they didn't try too hard to have us change our minds. There were a suprising amount of people also waiting in the lobby to cancel theirs as well. From where we just wait 15 days to get our money back. *Fingers crossed*
If you are nominated, you’ve been awarded the Versatile Blogger award.
Pro-hormone supplements, that are available at local health stores, can also cause the body of teenagers to stop growing as it reacts with the growth hormones leading them to cancel each other out.
Such a dreamy, French room...
A very good morning to all my lovely bloggy buddies from your favourite Furry Boy. It's looks as though the crafty girl is feeling better.....well if the cubbyhole is anything to go by and for all those who think that I live with the neatest and tidiest human on the planet...well think again folks...the cubbyhole is an absolute tip. No self respecting canine would be seen dead in there at the moment...just imagine if one of those punches was to land on my head so I am keeping well out of the way and have taken up residence on the comfiest sofa in the house.
As I was pondering this conundrum, a portly figure in towering heels and with a raucous, and most unwholesome, laugh sprang to mind. Cynthia Payne, Madame Cyn of Streatham, or at least, if not the lady herself, her willing and loyal clientèle.
The work itself spanned simple trail maintenance to highly technical rock work. Several stair cases were built and involved planning and moving rocks weighing up to half a ton. One stair case deemed “Stairway to Heaven” by a student, took several weeks to complete.
God was perfect. God was love. God was no respecter of persons. He may have been into some brutal things in the Old Testament—animal sacrifice, pharisaical rules, wives and concubines, smiting cities like ants. He may have been a harsh, unpredictable God who played constant favorites, but that had ended with the coming of Jesus Christ, hadn’t it?
For book group in the evening I covered the bundt cake with a cider/maple glaze. I served the cake with whipped cream - which I consider essential to this cake - and drizzled some more of the cider glaze on top. I loved the way the glaze added even more apple-y goodness to an already delicious cake. My tasters were extremely enthusiastic about this one, in part because of the great recipe and in part because there had been a very long summer break since our last meeting.
Other popular lines of the weekend included the definition of “glass ceiling,” from Jane Harman, the former California Democratic congresswoman: “It’s actually a thick layer of men.”
Even though I have nothing to do with ABC, have no connections at ABC, have no financial interest in ABC, and despite the fact that I cannot even spell ABC without someone spotting me two letters in advance, the wife will undoubtedly look at Ugly Betty getting canned as being all my doing. It is ALWAYS the husbands fault!
Gillis asked for us to be put off the air until we could prove that we supported and broadcast Canadian values, of course that would mean her version of Canadian values which might included bowing before her and the million dollars plus she’s sucked from the pockets of taxpayers over the years.
Sunday, March 4th–I watched “The Lives Of Others.”
of Reconstruction and even after
Enter the realm of The Immortals—and experience the extraordinary #1 New York Times bestselling series that has taken the world by storm.
Rumpelstilskin, artist unknown
Mile 16 - 10:31
“And so you shall, my dear sir!” his visitor exclaimed. “Owing to the war, I’m living at present in rooms in Bloomsbury. I can’t afford to keep up my house in Wales, and I want to be near my little girl, who is working at the Ministry of Munitions. But I’m too fond of the picture to part with it even for a time. It’s my especial pride. I can’t think how you can keep these glowing canvases unhung. You must look me up and give me your honest opinion. I’m only sorry I can’t show you my collection; but that will have to wait. Meantime, look me up at 33, Patmore Street, Bloomsbury. I find it so handy, you know, for the Museum. One thing only I would beg – a clear twenty-four hours’ notice. I am a martyr to asthma, and during an attack I find it impossible to see any one. As to the hour, my mornings and afternoons are usually occupied, but any evening, Mr. Digby, when you’re in town, I should be delighted to see you.”
London Olympic organizers outlined an extravaganza of arts events Thursday to coincide with the 2012 Summer Games, offering a blockbuster program to cheer the nation and celebrate all things arty.
As an example, if you are a liberal, what would it take to convince you that government has gone beyond reason, and certainly beyond the anticipated scope envisioned by the framers, when it comes to the influence government should have in citizens' lives?
So… Friday night we did nothing but wood-staining-related work. We started after dinner, around 6:30ish, and went until just past midnight. This was both our longest night, and our latest night. Kipp & Casey came over afterwards, but we were all pretty tired, and they were having trouble focusing on things just like us. We did manage to watch the finale of American Dad, which was funny.
Dissolve the yeast and honey or sugar in half of the tepid water. The water needs to be around body temperature in order to get the yeast activated but not so hot that it denatures or kills the yeast
Asking me to be part of Sisters in Crime's Summit Team and attend the American Library Association's Summer Conference in New Orleans was a lot like throwing Br'er Rabbit in the Briar Patch! Of course, I'd been to mystery conferences and booksellers' conferences, but never to a library conference. I had everything laid out for the trip a month before I was due to pack.
Alas, Darwin has become the master of ceremonies at the Iron Age feast that will devour the last morsel of civility in Mandelatopia. The gloves have come off, the buffet for anarchy is set and there will be no Queensbury Rules when the battle-cry 'We demand our piece of the pie!' makes South Africa just another sorry footnote on the endless list of post-colonial African losers. Yawn….so bloody boring!
We LEFT to get away from you!
I have never heard any pastor talk about the 2 in the same sermon or in a discussion group. They are usually talked about in separate contexts. Rarely together which I find unusual. They are similar events. They are about servant hood. At one event, Jesus is the servant and at the other event he is being served. I find that important to look at.
It's not because it defies expectations--one thing I've learned about the many beers that I've tried, especially the more extreme types, is that if they say they're something they generally are. Hop bombs, quads, you name it, the big beers deliver big flavors. So, objectively this beer is exactly what it says it is. It may even be under-advertised. But that doesn't mean I like it. Shit on a shingle is also well described in Army mess halls, and from what I hear it kind of sucks.
I am a live music advocate and seek to share the news of bands playing at local venues in my home town. Being drawn to blues mostly but embrace all kinds of music. Funny most people say they do not like rap but I have heard some pretty good stuff from a local band called Da One 8 they are a class act. If you see a posting for them check them out and see for yourself. One does not have to go over the bridge to hear some real fine tunes, however there are some bands that draw you elsewhere. I hope this blog is a good use to you as it is to me.
Looking to Work from Home?
Although she was unsure if her dreams and idle musings of the perfect future had ever contained this degree of fantastic specificity, she had to admit to herself that- although he’d missed the fact that she didn’t like the centrality of ‘finding a man’ in her visions- he was right. His apparent ease at her psychoanalysis, something scores of others had failed at with much longer periods of diagnosis, both disturbed and intrigued her. She didn’t want to take a pill from a stranger, but she really did want to do something impulsive for once. After a few more seconds of turning him over in her mind, and at just the perfect moment to break the spell in his favour, he rattled the pills again. She broke into a smile and they both giggled.
Two of the favoured witnesses of our beloved Jesus’ Resurrection come before us on this day. Philip and James are here, bearing testimony to us that their Master is truly risen from the dead, that they have seen him, that they have touched him, that they have conversed with him, during these forty days. And, that we may have no doubt as to the truth of their testimony, they hold in their hands the instruments of the martyrdom they underwent for asserting that Jesus, after having suffered death, came to life again and rose from the grave. Philip is leaning upon the cross to which he was fastened, as Jesus had been; James is holding the club wherewith he was struck dead.
By the time Courtney got there Ethan was ready with a plan. Ethan explained the plan to everyone when Sheldon returned from his patrol. For some reasons the dog started barking every time he saw Sandra. For the first time Jin was happy with the dog. The plan was made and everybody knew what to do. They picked up their weapons and were off to go….
"anthropological theory of art" (see his "Art and Agency").
isaacs body just kind of did its own thing in the intestinal catergory & they didn't know what some things were & what they were connected to just from looking at them at first, which accounted for a lot of the extra time.
ROCK OF AGES is directed by Tony Award Nominee Kristin Hanggi (Bare, Pussycat Dolls on the Sunset Strip) and choreographed by Kelly Devine (Jersey Boys – Associate Choreographer). With a book by Chris D’Arienzo (writer and director of the film Barry Munday), original arrangements by David Gibbs (Counting Crows, Film: That Thing You Do) and the Music Supervision, Arrangements & Orchestrations by Ethan Popp (Tarzan; Europe: We Will Rock You, Mamma Mia).
Brodsky asked why the draft document forwarded to his committee contained redactions.
#11 How do you see yourself in ten years time?
Pot: Home Goods
1. I used a 10- inch wire framed wreath from Wal-Mart. I figured creating the wreath while it hung on the door would be a good idea so I could see how it was coming along as I went.
Like most modern fiction deemed “serious” ever since the 1950s, it deals with resigned acceptance of alienation. That is why I stopped reading serious fiction in favor of genre, like mysteries, science fiction and fantasy. I hate reading about resigned acceptance of alienation. To me alienation should be approached with a sense of the absurdity of the mental derangement that so often prompts it or with pure fury at the injustice that may have engendered it.
Perhaps I shouldn’t post this after a weekend during which so many people had to endure a blizzard, but I can’t resist.
Obviously we're too close to the event to get a refund, so we've got two shooters slots at position 7, and two banquet seats open.
We plan to add more as time goes by. Potted plants like Cactus and Desert Succulents are fairly easy to move. I am trying to land a job at either NAS Lemoore CA or NAWS China Lake CA. China Lake is in the far NE Corner of Kern County at Ridgecrest.
That’s what it said as it dropped,
(For sanity's sake, I am not including any sets that Donruss makes these days or has made in the last few years. The cut-off is 2005).
A year later and once again, three Marvel characters would appear in movies, two of which would be sequels. Spider-man 2, proved that audiences still weren’t done with comic book movies. Returning director Sam Raimi and cast members Toby Maguire and Kirsten Dunst were joined by Alfred Malina who played arch villain Otto Octavius (a.k.a. Doctor Octopus), albeit in a more sympathetic light than as maniacle as seen in the comics. The movie contained a huge dose of action including an incredible sequence with a chase on an elevated train which stands out as one of the best comic book action sequences ever commited to film.
Lesson 3: Consider Etsy.
Something Strange and Deadly - Susan Dennard
…warm, crunchy, golden, FRESH spring rolls à la Annie! Gah, brings back the taste of Cantonese dim sum restaurants ^__^ The only problem was…they didn’t stay crispy!! The spring rolls turned soggy after awhile, and I think what I did wrong was that I didn’t soak up all the oil with paper towels immediately. Perhaps the ingredients also needed to be drained as much as possible before rolling, and that’ll be two lessons learned for the next time! Because of this little problem I didn’t end up making spring rolls for Cindy, but at least we had sushi and mussels. Let’s try this spring roll thing again next time!
from this time will ever see that girl again...'
So I think that if you sit in sukhAsana, vajrAsana, padmAsana or ardhapadmAsana and join your palms together in a namaskAra, accurately chant the beautiful nAma sahasram, with your mind paying attention to the meaning of each word, then you will be elevated.
What we say today is only an inadequate expression of what we carry in our hearts. Words pale in the shadow of grief; they seem insufficient even to measure the brave sacrifice of those you loved and we so admired. Their truest testimony will not be in the words we speak, but in the way they led their lives and in the way they lost those lives – with dedication, honor and an unquenchable desire to explore this mysterious and beautiful universe.
I treat him as I would he unto me
The best books are those written without these signs. Though that is extremely hard to accomplish, it can be done. The same idea is behind my feeling about these signs as is behind my feelings about book teasers and spoilers (read this post for more information): I want to be surprised. And what is more surprising: a person jumping out of you from behind a solid partition in a chicken costume, or someone slowly approaching you in full daylight wearing bright pink? (If you weren’t expecting anyone to come along in bright pink, perhaps you’d say the second option, but for the purpose of this post we’ll just go with the first.) That’s right, the walking poultry is much more surprising. So if you saw that person in bright pink slowly ambling toward you, admiring the scenery and giving you altogether too much time to examine him, would he surprise you if he reached you and calmly said, “Boo”? That’s almost what the author is attempting when he or she tries to surprise a veteran reader, unless the author is really good at his or her job (which you ought to hope he or she is, or else you’ll be pretty disappointed in the book).
With those demands, she became a person who felt that her dreams were wrong. She believed she needed to fulfill the demands, that was why she turned into a totally different person from her own dreams. And by knowing that she might please the people around her, she felt a bit better. Even though she left her dreams away in her bedroom and diaries, she felt good being the ‘submissive girl’ to the surroundings.
The sounds of automatic weapons and grenade blasts disturb Monterrey’s peace with distressing regularity as the Zetas battle rival crime groups for control of the drug trade and other lucrative criminal rackets in northeastern Mexico. The body count has exploded, with a killing being recorded for nearly every day of the year. Not long ago, Monterrey was considered the safest major metropolis in Latin America. Now, it’s one of the most dangerous.
Last weekend's events got me through this busy week. Whenever I needed a pick-me-up, I thought about the exciting, wonderful things that my friends have experienced recently. It's what life is all about... those moments and milestones that truly matter.
Issue #2 – This could be a simple timing of maturation. A lot of the dominant players are taller, weigh more, throw harder and have probably entered certain stages of maturation quicker than their peers. This doesn’t necessarily mean they’ll be ahead of their peers at 13-15 or even 16-18; it just means that at the age (11-12) we happen to televise, they were more developed. There are at least six more years before this player can even think about playing professionally, so a lot of things can happen to level out the playing field.
Thus, in one stroke, a third of the population is shifted into a government-run health care program. But that’s not all.
Physics style loving story.
This morning I bought a one-way ticket to Ecuador. I'll leave my lovely Tina in just one month.
In the Answer, the Examiner switched position and argued that it was the "system freeze" described in the reference that corresponded to the claimed "hardware error."
A woman can be turned on, lit up right next to you on the bus, for god’s sake, and you’d never know it—unless, perhaps, she was reading a romance novel with a lurid cover. And then one could be doubly protected from the uncomfortable reality of female desire: one could smirk at her poor choice of reading material, make assumptions about her sophistication as a reader, and dismiss her as a poor lonely woman who clearly needs a man in her life to make those books unnecessary: think Kathy Bates in Misery, perhaps, so wrapped up in her romance novels that she’s willing to maim her favorite author in order to get the “happy ending” she thinks she deserves.
_____Everyone is always bitching about wanting a dislike button but I want a "did you actually just post that lame status....do us all a favor and just go kill yourself now" button. (funny unlike button)
And as always check out Serendipitystamps.com and don't forget to sign up for the newsletter to get those awesome deals! And see the newly released stamps! They'll be your cup of tea!
Tuesday Tennessee was first to deploy VIPR simultaneously at five weigh stations and two bus stations across the state.
TH: I couldn’t respect Bobby Fischer. Because once I did it would throw my game off. I would think different. Even just a bit.
Creativity expert Sir Ken Robinson who led the British government’s 1988 advisory committee on creative and cultural education argues that we’ve been educated people to become good workers, rather than creative thinkers.
Note: Do not burn the tempering ingredients. Do the whole process in medium low flame.
I feel the anxiety of all of this bubble up in me, the warmth is going, the depression is coming at me at a million miles an hour.
Whales
So there you have it everyone, hope you enjoyed it. Pass it on to your friends and make sure you comment below so we can get this list up to 100.
“When are you going to find the hours to learn this format and do 100 pages in thirty days??” …I’m…I’m not.
Anyway, this is the type of music that them whipper-snappers listen to today. I don’t know how to categorize this music, other than the fact that every time I listen to this music, I daydream of dancing to intricately choreographed pieces to them. And it makes me sad, because to be able to dance to intricate choreography, you need to be able to dance at all. Which is what my GOAL is for this year.
"I can't help it I just find guys sexier when they have money. I mean I’d never sleep with someone unless he was a financially viable asset." At this point Fishy is turning puce so I interject "Me too the guys I date have to fill out a form."
Light flickers from across the hall
13. Destinantioon ecstasy (2:42)
He eventually ‘compromised’ by limiting his playing hours to between 12 – 1pm and 6 – 7pm each day, but according to one resident Chong Liling who posted on MP Alex Yam’s Facebook, though the playing frequency has decreased, the volume has gone up by a notch.
L.A. Noire is a third person detective game set in 1947. You play as cop named Cole Phelps who is promoted to a traffic detective shortly after the beginning of the game. Through the course of the game Cole is promoted to the homicide desk. While on his new job he is given the opportunity to investigate very iconic real world cases such as the black dahlia murders. As the game progresses you are transferred to vice, being moved around to different jobs makes for game play that’s fun and stays interesting.
Any last requests?
This past week has not been a good one as far as chickens are concerned. We had three new issues come up that were not so fun to deal with.
Our manager was a notoriously long-winded individual who typically got his way in any argument by wearing down his opponent until they had to abandon their position to attend their infant’s college graduation. In previous years, I might’ve at least packed an overnight bag so I could make the point that our vacation scheduling process was too cumbersome. But I had learned my lesson and was determined to remain taciturn.
the military
But that was not to be.
I’m definitely a gadget person. Anything new in gadgets, I have to have it while it’s still hot and brand new in the market, and I have tried most things out there. The Sennheiser MM 400 Bluetooth Headset is my latest discovery and my latest obsession. A bit on the pricey side, but it deserves every penny in my opinion.
have to admit they are so much more fun then model airplanes.
I have a lot on my mind right now. Had an appointment with Dr M today. He was very happy with my recent success. We discussed the hiatal hernia surgery. It is pretty much decided I need to fix it surgically. He wanted to take all my fill out today... but I didn't want to lose restriction. He is concerned about further cellular damage since my reflux is pretty much a daily thing. I ended up decided to keep my fill level where it is for now.
4. In the same skillet place the black onion seeds, fennel seeds, cumin seeds and fenugreek seeds.
Recently my little girl requested a new hat for Summer. She knew exactly what she wanted;
Sandals on a coffin.
He’s sold books to Bono and Maeve Binchy, and been mentioned in despatches from the Middle East. Declining book sales, however, have forced Michael Simonds to turn the final page on Dalkey’s iconic Exchange Bookshop.
Like I said: ironic.
The x-axis shows the size of the population in logarithmic scale. The y-axis is the Gini value. The “80-20 rule” corresponds to a Gini value of 0.75. Bubble size is proportional to the log(size), i.e. redundant with the x-axis.
I always say that myself here in this website.
As a result of the literary fiction post I linked above, Carl and I had a great conversation about the rub between literary fiction and genre fiction and how MANY MANY MANY literary fiction works do include an element of some genre or other: sf, historical, etc. It was interesting to go back and revisit this conversation Carl and I had because I've been spending a lot of time thinking over the books I read last year and gazing at my immediate TBR, and I know something very specific about my literary fiction tastes after seven months of this personal project: I MUCH prefer literary fiction that incorporates a specific genre or some sort of unique angle.
So that te swastika and the eagle
I wonder if its something in the water up there?
“I’m wearing your favorite skirt!”
To take him or her
I can't wait to see what you come up with.
2011- Drew Brees: Brees had his usual monster season for the Saints. Yet, like Fitzgerald, the Madden curse saved it’s powers for the playoffs. The Saints, facing a 7-9 Seattle team in the first round, were heavily, heavily, heavily favored to beat the Seahawks. (That was three heavily’s) The Seahawks proceeded to shock the world and the Saints. The game featured a legendary finishing run by Marshawn Lynch. Ironically Lynch’s run resembled the wrecklessness of the afore mentioned Madden ambulance. He stiffed armed players into the ground just like the grill of that ambulance. Coincidence? Not a chance.
I myself built the set the easy way and bought it completed about three years ago. I know that's like cheating, but I saved a lot on shipping charges by not having to pay $2-$3 each to have all 21 cards shipped from different sellers. The Jordan, Clyde Drexler and Dominique Wilkins are certainly favorites of mine, but the Shaq' is where it's at for me. Easily one of my favorite cards in my collection from one of my favorite 90's sets.
Anyway, back to looking through the costumes and working on my hat.
I used CCR and Imagine Hopscotch for the background and Create a Critter for the title and dino. The dino is on a wobble! She loved it! Oh yea, and the hat is a banner from Imagine Yummy I flipped and added some glitter stars! She's only 5!
Whether or not he deserved it, I wanted to forgive. And so I did.
The post in question was talking about the fact that I had accidentally passed my CCIE written again and found myself in a position to visit Belgium in the next 18 months and although I didn’t have it in my sights the seeds of opportunity are maturing quite nicely.
YTD listened to: 274
Our tiny cottage is a turn-of-the-century house with some quirky old house features. For instance, you can't open the drawer of the bathroom built-in if the bathroom door is closed because it hits the doorknob.
The British National Party offers the only hope for our country as the Establishment parties, in league with multi-national businesses and the European Union, knowingly destroy our society as we know it. Labour, the Tories and the Liberal Democrats have brought our country to its knees, and yet they still insist on giving aid, housing and jobs to foreign nationals whilst our own people are struggling to survive. Charity begins at home, and we must look after our own people first. Money and resources in Britain are just too scarce for us to solve all the World's problems, but the Establishment parties would rather help others whilst our own people suffer.
It was my turn to choose the Theme this week and it is "Santa's Hat"
was show you my personal style.
And when I awaken the next morning I know there will be a return letter waiting for me – just as sure as I know the sun will rise. And I know that whatever concern I expressed in my letter, will be soothed, comforted and logically rationalized to me.
I didn’t use an editor on Changers’ Summer – partly because this was an experiment in what it was possible to do to earn some money and I didn’t want to invest too much into the production of the book. However, Changers’ Summer has been through two writers’ groups, plus a number of beta-readers. The first draft was completed in 2001 and it has been rewritten through a number of drafts since then as well as having been commented on in detail by an agent.
These five questions are worth 20 percent of the midterm (4 points apiece). Please, please, please use your brains AND THE INTERNET (that is, you must have links) to give me some interesting, creative, thoughtful answers. You may download to Word and attach or just answer in the email. You have until 7:30 p.m. to finish and email back this portion of the midterm.
ORIGAMI - CUP
For £2,500, I would want my clothes, washed, dried, folded and ironed.
Brahim, if he chooses to think for himself and cot continue to be a pawn, would know that times have changed.
Due date: When the assignment is due.
Note: For a richer soup, double the butter, flour and milk amounts. I just want a touch of creaminess so I am keeping it lighter.
Hope you are all ok. Thought I'd better post a card as I will be disappearing for a while. I am off to hospital tomorrow for a back operation and wont be able to sit down for about 8 weeks, so crafting is out of the question. But at least I will be able to blog hop and actually post comments on peoples cards for a change :-)
1 teaspoon white vinegar
I don’t think I have read one single mainstream news report that has called into question the very serious anomalies in the case that shatter the illusion of Breivik the “solo terrorist”. It was the “solo terrorist” who is insane for 7 months until public opinion in Norway forced through another psychological report to be carried out, which has turned out, 3 weeks before trial, to be completely contradictory to the first ‘official line’ of insane (paranoid psychotic schizophrenic).
Such programs merely scratch the surface of what is likely to be a gargantuan and overarching black-budget funded project to geo-engineer the planet, with little or no care for the unknown environmental consequences this could engender.
STEP 4: In a medium bowl whisk together the eggs until fairly smooth. Add the milk, parmesan, and another small sprinkle of pepper. Whisk to combine. (This step can be completed while the mushrooms are cooking) Pour this mixture into the pie dish over the spinach, mushrooms, and feta.
Erm, not so fast. The flip side of this gold coin is what players do when something new goes live: jump all over it. That means some players are going to be looking for pets when it launches because they won’t have collected very many. Or, they’ll fight a pet they’ve never seen and want it. So those players might actually pay more. Actually, I can guarantee you some will.
Book 2 - cotton (clothing or sheets - depends on time of year)
As detectives interview Beauchamp, the state Department of Children and Families is collaborating with law enforcement. Child care workers are looking through the current list of runaway kids to see if there’s any child who matches the description of the two found in the canal.
Mayer KL, Ho HS, Goodnight JE Jr. Childbearing and child care in surgery. Arch Surg 2001; 136: 649-655.
After this, I am off of school for the month of December.
Think of Anselm Kiefer (two years younger than Palermo), and how more than anything else, his self-portrait and personality are the origin and center-point of his oeuvre. Beuys and Kiefer are part of a German cult of personality rooted in the stridently romantic Teutonic past, where a lyric poet or an opera composer could unlock the secrets of the universe and heal the world.
5. Add 2 cups of water and close the cooker. Cook for 4-5 whistles.
As soon as receiving word of the incident, the Ministry of Industry and Trade (MoIT) issued a diplomatic note opposing the launch of the countervailing duty investigation by US authorities against Vietnam’s steel products.
I'll let you go and read all the details on the CASual Fridays blog, whilst you are there check out the line-up of inspiration from all the Girl Fridays and leave them some love... I shouldn't really say this but I think us newbies were a little nervous about our debut challenge... but you didn't hear that from me though, right! *wink*
This is not, of course, to deny the mutual sectarian hostility that existed between Catholics and Protestants in NI, but simply to point out that the exercising of this hostility was not the primary motivating factor for the PIRA. The PIRA set off thousands of bombs during the Troubles, but only the very smallest fraction of them have become notorious for having killed large numbers of civilians. This is not the behaviour one would expect of an organization which took the killing of civilians as a key objective. Truck bombs of the sort that devastated English cities in the 1990s could have killed hundreds of civilians if the PIRA had detonated them with such murderous intent.
BACK TO THE GRIND!
11. Who was the last person you talked to on a landline?
615. Black Bean & Pepperoni Soup and Fried Egg, Beet Greens, Sprouts, & Spring Onions @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 12:32 p.m.
Members do not need to bring lunch as Clementina’s workshop will be followed by a light finger snack lunch whilst they interact with her. Please note that the meeting will finish earlier than usual.
Because those were moments when we drew a little ways away from Christ, which actually answers the original question: why does Christ’s ability to give us all His attributes matter? Because they affect our day-to-day life. When we draw away from Him, our lives start reflecting more of us, and less of Him. Christ both can and will give us patience, the ability to love, have kindness, not to mention the ability to pass on the remote, and many other things as well. We only have to do two things:
9. Roses Red, Violets Blue - Judy Garland
Some Sweet and Effective Cures For Sweaty Feet
After lunch, we rested for about 3 hours then at 4pm we decided to go to Mt. Tapyas. When I saw the stairs that we need to climb, I was in shock, didn’t expect it would be high. It has more than 700 steps. But I don’t want to left behind so I just go with the flow. Here’s a clip of our experience conquering Mt. Tapyas.
When I have fully set in, such a desolate welcome there was for me I thought.
9 am train
Phivolcs said the quake was felt at various intensities in Mamburao and Batangas City; Makati City, Pasay City, Manila City, Tagaytay City and Dasmariñas City; in San Jose town (in Occidental Mindoro), Puerto Galera, Malay (in Aklan), and Guinayangan (in Quezon).
Everyone handles their own birthdays differently. Some like to make a big deal out of it, others like to have a small, quaint affair with their close friends and loved ones, and others like me, think, “Well, you only get one a year, so might as well do something.”
My favorite example of the collective government ownership of these corporations is Microsoft. This will really hit home with most of you. Though collective government investments, Microsoft Corporation is approximately 83% owned by government. Take the investments of the five burrows of New York City, add in the pension funds of CALPERS in California (which is now an offshore corporate fund) and other state funds, a few school districts here and there, and many other small, medium and large individual governments and municipalities across the nation, combine them together, and you come up with the representative governmental investment total of around 83% majority ownership. The easy way to say this is that the government owns 83% of Microsoft.
Strategy is frequently both misunderstood and bandied about by companies in a sometimes worrying way. Read Peter Knight's excellent recent column in Ethical Corporation for a typically amusing and eloquent view on that.
Commentary On Self Continues
"But it's not yours!"
The most exciting moment was seeing my book in WHSmiths – and seeing 15,000 copies being bound was pretty awesome too.
Instead of asking why Middle Eastern civilization has failed so abjectly, our president suggests that we're the failures.
Add to that a partner whose final exams have been moved up this year so that we're both super-pressed for time at the same time. PLUS Christmas--shopping, planning, concerts and rehearsals for the boy...
“Here’s another of God’s miracles!” I rejoiced, sharing her story with Neli-Beli and her family who waited beside me.
Proverbs 14:12 There is a way which seems right to a man, but its end is the way of death. (NASB)
He glanced to his right, where Hart was pointing to the light. “Buddy, light’s green. Has been. Where the hell were you?”
I avoided writing blogs due to this thought and started finding reasons as inadequate time. The truth is that I used to watch movies after I was back from office though I had time to write and topics to write.
Preheat the grill on medium. Cut red onion and capsicum into small cubes.
Yow. I can understand why OEM's want suppliers to play nice with their respective patent portfolios - nobody wants to explain to their customers that orders aren't being filled because two suppliers are having a brawl over a patent. And while one may argue that the value of the sales contract adequately compensates the supplier forfeiting their IP rights, this seems like an onerous policy. And the OEM's don't seem to be losing any sleep over this practice either. When the German auto industry group VDA (Verband der Automobilindustrie) was asked to respond to these allegations, the spokesman said "we see no reason to comment."
i've realized, now that i can enjoy rational thought process, that if we've had a small handful of failed attempts, accepting things and adapting is truly the only way to go. unless i want to spend the rest of my day in a state of resistance – which is just about the shittiest place to be.
I know we all NEED shoes, but who doesn't just LOVE shoes? I mean really, such an incredible way to make a fashion statement, am I right or am I right? Dog's are a man's best friend, shoes are a girls! And shoes are also a huge investment. And to ensure they look great from day to day, keeping them organized is EXTREMELY important!
Overall, eReaders and eBooks have come a long way, but still have a long way to go to provide a seamless experience throughout. Even iPad versions of books are very limited and for all the fancy animations, iBooks does not have the huge library of books to parallel the music library on iTunes. Newspaper and Magazines are probably better enjoyed in a tablet, where links and interactive features can provide a new and exciting experience for readers. But in all, I’m still happy with my Kobo because of its portability, the capacity to store so many books and the eInk screen that is comfortable to read from. It is on the affordable end of the eReader scale because it is also a no-nonsense eReader. It does not browse, show video or provide any other exciting features, but it does its main job –allowing you to read books- very well.
According to study conducted by Kaplan and Maier, the device caused a significant reduction in risk of death as compared with the medical therapy group. Figure on the slide shows the rates of survival. The study clearly shows that the device can prolong life beyond optimal medical therapy in desperately ill New York Heart Association class IV patients, but only for 6 months.
does the autocorrect from apple drive anyone else crazy? it keeps trying to correct craftsy and chickies and bom. seriously. i've gotta turn that off!
Contrary to popular believe, 'bed hair' does not involve getting out of bed, putting clothes on than being ready! a little of effort goes into tame looking messy hair and a little bit more mousse to keep it from going flat (or should i say staying flat after getting up). this would look very rock chick chic if done right and you dont have to worry about your hair getting messy.. because it already 'is' technically, which equals great hair for school!
Over the next two years, two high-profile film and television projects will be released featuring America’s 16th President, Abraham Lincoln. This December, Steven Spielberg’s Lincoln, a biopic on Lincoln set in the last three months of his Presidency, will feature Academy Award-winning actor Daniel Day-Lewis (Gangs of New York, There Will Be Blood, Last of the Mohicans) as Lincoln. This will be followed in 2013 by the highly-anticipated miniseries “To Appomattox,” which will feature acclaimed actor Stephen Lang (Avatar, Gods and Generals, Gettysburg, TV’s “Terra Nova”) as the President (There’s also Abraham Lincoln: Vampire Hunter, which I flat out refuse to talk about on this blog). These two projects will add to the list of nearly 300 film and television portrayals of the man labeled our greatest President. But of all these different portrayals, which of these truly stand out as the best of the bunch? With this article, I shall look at my five favorite portrayals of Lincoln on film (so far). They are in sequential order, mostly going by year of release.
Confusing unfun and unfree societies and their tender sensitive feelings is yet another sorry example of the sad, failed, played out realpolitik type thinking that everything in nation/stateland is equal.
“What am I going to do with you?” he asks playfully. “One day you’ll tumble over the edge of that cliff and then what will I do? I’m afraid your father would be very angry with me for not saving the mare.” I cock my head and stick out my tongue.
So I bet you are wondering how the bird turned out. It was really, really good. I always put some stuffing under the skin over the breast and a bit over the thigh area which adds flavor and keeps the breast moist and this year was no different. (Thank goodness!). It was not as juicy as it usually is, but wasn't dry. The moral to this story is brine your bird, stuff under the skin over the breast and thigh area and get a damn oven-probe thermometer with an alarm. After as many years as I have cooked turkeys, you would think I would have one by now. Gravy is always a must!
Sure it's nice when people agree with me; but I am one of those stubborn contrarian moron imbecile's who only wants anothers agreement, IF THEY REALLY AGREE WITH ME. I'd rather agree to disagree, than pretend we are in agreement, and live under that illusion.
Angry over this turn of events, I attempt to escape after another time jump. The Rugged Man finds out about this, and in the process of fleeing I am shot in the stomach and left to die in the yard. Which, as one may imagine, I did. Yet the dream didn’t end.
Where does time go? Oh my word! It seems like Kiley was just 6 weeks old, I went back to work, and BAM!, now time has been "fast forwarded" to 3 months already!!! Well, throw in the holidays and all the hustle and bustle involved with that, plus a lingering illness and it's easy to lose all sense of time. Christmas was truly a beautiful day. We enjoyed having Scott's mom stay with us Christmas Eve and Christmas Day. She got to see Kiley on Christmas morning and watch as we opened her gifts. It was a most enjoyable time!
Today, I am going to introduce you to this amazing product! Since, December I have had eczema on my face! yeah, no so pretty right!! (I tried everything, except going to a doctor) nothing was working.... So, I said to myself "Kiehl's!" so off I went two weeks ago. I spoke to the sales girl and she recommended "Midnight Recovery Concentrate" It is their customer favorite!! and I can tell you why. Once, I place a drop of oil on my skin the redness decreased and the burning stopped. Now over a week later and it is all but gone!! GONE, I say. I love this oil. It makes my face feel wonderfully soft and smooth. It is worth every penny!
Overall, the book is enjoyable but a little too brief. May begins her first chapter with the lyrics to Loretta Lynn’s “The Pill” (shown below), and that really sets the tone for the cultural focus of the book. I did think the research could have dug deeper into certain areas; I would have loved to hear more about the scientific aspects of the pill, especially since May’s father was one of the doctors who helped develop it! Also, those who are already familiar with the history and controversies of the pill probably won’t come away with too much new information. Still, it was interesting to see the development of birth control from a purely cultural perspective, and given the growing number of political attacks on American women’s reproductive health/freedom over the past year, the book couldn’t be more timely.
It'll be interesting to see how this does in the position it is, a very seasonal business surely? And if you end up with drunks, trouble and more litter on the beach, they could be in for a lot of bad press blaming Brains whether they're responsible or not. We'll have to watch this (ugly) space.
Bert Weedon would have a lasting impact on many British rock bands of the Sixties and Seventies, and as a result he would have an impact on rock music worldwide. One need only consider that guitarists in three of the biggest bands of all time, The Beatles, The Rolling Stones, and The Who, all learned their craft from Bert Weedon's books. In fact, it is possible that some may not have become guitarists had it not been for Mr. Weedon. In a eulogy by Neil McCormick in The Daily Telegraph entitled "Farewell Bert Weedon,the man who helped make stars of John Lennon and Paul McCartney," Eric Clapton was quoted as saying, "I wouldn’t have felt the urge to press on without the tips and encouragement Bert’s book gives you." To a large degree, then, Bert Weedon is responsible for the success of the British rock bands of the Sixties and the genres they would give rise to, everything from power pop to heavy metal. Few men could boast such an important place in rock history.
Especially the picture wall...
It is going to be unpretty...I am telling you.
-Examples of horrific treatment of women and extreme violence supported by both Allah and his prophet Mohammad
I remember the episode well personally as I had just written a book on politics at the time. The internet has a short memory but I don't
At a car dealership.
The Malt Whisky Yearbook 2011 is also available for preorder. The Yearbook is an invaluable tool for any whisky fan, with detailed listings of all of the malt whisky distilleries, bottlers, and blenders and containing articles reviewing the year in whisky. It's another one that I buy every year.
As I walked through the halls of the building I first entered in the fall of 1991, everything seemed different. How could things be the same when the building where I have come since my children were young (three are now married, two with children of their own) will, in a few months, no longer be my almost daily destination?
Andrew: The response has been phenomenal. We are starting to get serious interest from publishers and overseas promoters on the strength of the album.
(Daddy picked out the potty seat hehe)
chest wrapped in a potato sack, sleeping
Look what he says. Philippians 4:11,
One common theme was echoed. The US has subsidized the housing market to the point that it had a massive heart attack. Low down payment mortgages subsidized by taxpayers is a culprit in creating a housing bubble along with streamlined underwriting. Fannie, Freddie and the FHA had underpriced mortgage insurance and captured the residential mortgage market. All this was done in the name of “affordable housing” and “access to ownership.” Throw in the mortgage interest deduction to encourage bigger and bigger “McMansions,” and we have a problem.
We offer investment consulting and retirement planning services through Morningstar Associates, LLC and Ibbotson Associates; registered investment advisors and wholly owned subsidiaries of Morningstar, Inc. We also offer MorningstarÂ® Managed Portfolios, an asset management service for financial advisors, through Morningstar Investment Services, Inc., a registered investment advisor, broker-dealer, and a subsidiary of Morningstar, Inc.
PS: Speaking of pictures, I finally downloaded Instagram! (I've been waiting for it to come out for Android and it finally did!) I'm still trying to figure out how to use it, but I'll be uploading pictures (or trying to!) all weekend so feel free to follow me! (username: janemarieg)
Is that because the words aren’t right for the moment..or the words don’t do the moment justice? Words can be very powerful and should be chosen wisely. There have been some amazing wordflows though history.. How can words make you feel as though you’re in a moment and time that is not your own? I think about how lyrics in a song can really tie experiences to memories and how really powerful reading and singing can be.
Here is a condensed version of Elijah’s story from I Kings 18 and 19… he was a prophet of God. There was a three year drought in Israel. God provided for Elijah with water from the brook and food from the birds… not bird food either but meat and bread! After the water from the brook dried up God sent Elijah to a widow and her son to provide food and water for him. The lady’s pantry was empty… she only had enough food left to make one biscuit for her and her son before they would starve, but Elijah told her if she would share her food with him the Lord would not let her flour and oil go empty until the drought was over. She did as she was asked and God did as He promised.
in the many photographs of Flöge modeling
Contrarian that I am, I’m going to start with the second rule on the list. It seems timely, as this summer and this fall have been full of moments of waiting for something to start, something to end--waiting, in other words, for a different time.
Antarctic research started with James Cook’s expedition (1872-1775) in search for the terra incognita australis, a construct of the Greek understanding of the world, where the known Arctic regions would have a corresponding Ant-Arctic in the south. Cook only found ice, but no continent, when he crossed the southern Polar Circle, which kept the area unexplored until a Baltic German Naval officer working in the Russian service named Fabian Gottlieb von Bellingshausen made the first land sighting of Antarctica during his circumnavigation (1819-1821). His report of seals and whales attracted sealers and whalers like the British James Weddell, who made further discoveries like the Weddell Sea.
As beer blogging matures as a medium there are an increasing number of discussions on what constitutes ethical blogging. Is it OK to write about a brewery's beers if they've taken you on a tour or sent you free product? Or if you've done some kind of consultancy for them?
'Twas the night before Xmas,
It just seems so recently that my DH and I used to spell words so S wouldn’t understand what we were discussing, like if we want to suggest going out for dinner, we would go ‘Do you want to G-O O-U-T for D-I-N-N-E-R?”, so in case we both don’t agree, we wouldn’t have gotten S all excited!! And now S does the same thing to me all the time when she doesn’t want A to know what we are discussing!! It is amazing how time flies so fast!!
I have just made the realization that Daughter #2 really needs to be in the CIA. She should be a spy. She should be some sort of profession where they are trying to BREAK your spirit because the girl, at age 6, is nearly unbreakable. Friend SH, often describes Daughter #2 as having "great follow through." That's a very polite way of saying super fixated and stubborn.
Tom is doing well at work, and is on the verge of a promotion; so send good thoughts our way, everyone! We're in the process of buying a rental unit (Tom's idea; I'm not so big on investment properties). He's really excited about it. I'm pretending it's not happening.
I have been really busy making and sending out Birthday Gifts to my Dear Friends!
For example, lunchtimes. Instead of all heading out to buy sandwiches, or eating homemade packed lunches at our desks, one of us makes a soup. Which we all down tools and share for three quarters of an hour, or so, and chat about stuff we've seen, heard, read or done, or chew over some work-related gristle (less often it has to be said). You know, relax. Buy some headspace on whatever's happened that morning. Get a perspective. Re-energise ourselves. Remember there is more to each of us than being a member of staff. That we have other lives, pasts and imaginations. It's almost like a Friday night drink every day, without the alcohol.
As promised let's discuss the garden floor, an often forgotten design element. I view it as the same as selecting rugs for your interiors, and you know the thought that goes into those decisions!
Others were making use of the river in their own way, such as these rowers receiving instructions from their trainer. We also noticed another denizen lurking nearby. If you dislike rats, then look away now!
And we too, will survive.
He was glowing in the light, and wearing a white fitted suit with a gold armband and gold belt around his waist. He was wearing gold cufflinks and gold shoes. His hair was a mass of black curls which tumbled around his chiselled, handsome face.
migrated there.
Lack of training in attention,
Transaction Amount RM167.88
As a note, these covers have a mesh layer inside the diaper which you won't see in my picture because I trimmed it out. I didn't like that it would get wet during use, and unlike vinyl or PUL, you can't just wipe it clean. So removing the mesh may have made them less effective (though I tried them both ways, and didn't notice a difference).
We meet and get to know mom through her children as they flagellate themselves with guilt. The famous novelist daughter, the successful businessman son, and the philandering, clueless husband each speak to mom as if she's still here, toting up all the extraordinary things that she did and sacrifices she made so that they could be who they've become. My nasty little self wanted to say, "how did that work for ya?"
Last winter one of the Oriental Plum trees appeared lost. The snows weighted his boughs and he fell to the ground where he lay frozen under drifts until spring. The Fireteacher dug him out, I'd tried but needed more bicep, he lifted the scraggly guy out, redug his bed and sprinkled plant food where the tap root would be placed and tamped the Earth over the food and around the base of the tree, tying the trunk to stakes so the tree would stand. That was months ago it seems. I've been watering him delicately, chatting all along, encouraging, smoothing his wounds with my fingertips and over the past two weeks bundles of sweet little leaves suddenly appeared. His spring buds are late, he probably won't do showy flowers this year either, but it matters not at all.
There are many things I miss about having my children grown and gone. I miss the sounds of their voices and the laughter. I don't miss the dirty laundry mountain. I miss the hikes through the woods as we sang 'The ants go marching one by one...' I miss their hugs and kisses. I don't miss the 'clean your bedroom' routine. I miss the fact that I can't blame my messy house on them. I miss the creativity and energy that was contagious. I don't miss the waiting up until they returned home ~ safe and sound. I miss the conversations. I don't miss the squabbling. One tradition that I miss is 'What's your best thing'? At dinner time in order to keep everyone focused and positive we would each have to say the best thing that happened to us that day. Sometimes the answer might be 'I woke up' but that was okay. No one could pass - you had to say something. It actually was a wonderful conversation starter plus it allowed me to have insight into their lives that might have been missed.
How ‘Bout Them Dawgs!
According to Mazibuko, "an open tender process was followed in awarding the contracts" and "no possible conflicts of interests exists".
I am SO grateful that I was led to this profession, especially now that I don't know what the future may hold. I know that I will always have the sweetest hugs, especially on those days when I have been on the phone with 3 different doctors, or when I return from an unexpected absence because my husband has spent another afternoon in the ER.
“It looks like Paradise,” I say.
Paper: Gina K Designs Kraft, Lipstick Red and Pure White
Lots of my favorite blogs talk about how they eat overnight oats for breakfast all the time. I think the problem might be that I’m not using enough fruits, nuts, yogurt, etc., to make it flavorful…because the way I made them on Sunday night was just blah on Monday. I had some strawberries with the bites I ate, but I just wasn’t feeling it. The texture was so-so, but I haven’t been able to use Chia seeds yet. This may become a summer experiment as I try different recipes and variations.
He is the 21st century antithesis of Lincoln, who ended his first Inaugural Address with this impassioned plea:
Update 6 : Google Buzz Has Been Raplaced With Google Plus. 10 Dec 2011
so he opened not his mouth.
Medical Statement Forms for all 4 of us
all my talking on that night except for that tiny little voice in the
These little guys really were so easy! I took strips of white tissue paper and mod podged them on to empty canning jars. Any empty jar would work. After I got the strips on I put a layer of Mod podge over the top to seal it and took the rounded tip of a paint brush and did the eyes and mouth. I also painted the rim black. My kids each did one with me, but I think they were a little too messy for their skill level (7 and 5). I think these would be cute either filled with goodies, or just as deocoration like I have them. I want to try to stick some Christmas lights in them and see how they look, what do you think? I am linking up to thrifty decor chick
Sure enough a shadowy figure soon appears at Walter’s stable. It is probably the Colonel’s step son. He’s says just three words but we know this is terrible news for Walter – “How’s my horse?”.
If you missed my blog last week, I talked about Karma, it was a hit let me tell you, check it out if you have minute or two. That’s what usually follows after someone tears your heart out, or perhaps that’s what you’ve earned after your own number of mistakes. Don’t worry, I’m okay, my heart is good and strong beating like a drum in a drum circle. Filled with love and joy not anger and resent because as cliche as it might sound, the line between love and hate is very thin. People, woman to be more upfront usually ask me, “Where’s the guy who writes all the sweet stuff?” Well, he’s there, but hearts aren’t simply handed out, you earn them. I once said that love is a big tree, you plant the seed, you take care of it, you nourish it and enjoy it once it’s big and strong. I don’t believe you plant a seed and get a tree the next morning.
Read this way, the Psalm has an application in nearly every generation of Israel’s history. Even after the Temple was rebuilt and some Jews returned to Jerusalem, there was still a sense that the exile continued since they were under foreign domination.
Recently I took a workshop in a variety of styles of dancing, and one of the styles was burlesque. This at the time was for me somehow surprising but afterwards not so, I obviously had been concentrating on only one facet of the workshop ignoring the rest. I really did not feel sexy when we started off, my advice here is; dress to kill. Whether this is your sexy little black number, your jeans with that fabulous sparkly top or your retro tea dress with a flower in your hair but don’t wear your track pants and tee without on ounce of make-up.
“Didn’t George tell you?”
I had a mixed reaction to the last line--flattered, dismissive, and slightly freaked out. Downstairs Neighbor asked, did you send him a picture? No. Maybe he was looking at photos of you on Facebook? We're not Facebook friends yet, and you can't even find me on there unless we have a Facebook friend in common. Without context, what's the deal? I actually work up in the middle of the night thinking about an article I read at the hairdresser about a woman married to a guy who turned out to be a serial killer. (My mind would go there.) But, ultimately, I'll give him the benefit of the doubt that there was some non-creepy context for his comment that he just didn't specify. So, I come back to my second reaction--dismissive--I just can't take it too seriously, especially since, after I responded with more warmth to his very warm email of a week ago Sunday, he disappeared, and I don't know yet if that was just coincidence. I suspect that he may have a fear of intimacy, given some things in his background, and I don't know yet how that might manifest itself.
I saw this gorgeous boy on a local Animal Rescue and he looks so much like our Duffy we just had to meet him. It was love at first sight. I will go into more details later but I wanted all of you to meet our Rufus.
The first week I was home my littlest El- Leeland, was so sweet and clingy. Constantly asking me to hold him. “Hold you, Momma?” How can I resist that? But, he is over thirty pounds, so holding him while doing everything else can be a bit challenging. Making dinner, for example is nearly impossible. But, we’ve figured it out. This week he has asked me to hold him less and I think is feeling more and more confident that I’m sticking around.
Katty Kay got the correct answer for a total of $8,000
waking snotty and him always coming up to my room talking so fast about every project and asking for scissors and i’m dreading taxes which i have not done and thinking how, can i get all of these things done.
2: Babe La Strange
According to CNN, what will come next after Georgia - will they attack Czech Republic?
The one thing I’m firmly convinced of is that the larger, affluent middle classes in this country will never surrender their lifestyle and its privileges. If suddenly faced with a threat in which they may be made homeless by disaster, or killed by plagues, I think you can expect very, very irrational reactions – which of course will inscribe themselves in a spatial order, and probably in spectacular ways. I think one thing that would emerge after an avian flu pandemic, if it does occur, will be a lot of focus on biosecurity at the level of domestic space.
There followed a fairly farcical half hour, where the cats would corner the mouse behind a pile of crap, we would start moving the crap, the mouse would make a break for escape, shoot across the room and under another pile of crap, with two portly cats and a pair of shrieking humans armed with cardboard boxes lumbering behind it (by crap, I don't mean literal crap. Our house is not filled with mounds of dung. Honestly. But given that we live in relative chaos at the best of times, add in a new(ish) baby and all the trimmings, and blooming Christmas, complete with tree and sacks and sacks and sacks of presents, and you have mounds of toppling stuff in every corner and cranny, just perfect for a petrified mouse to cower under).
I can't move away from it.
Laugh.
Well, didn't I tell you I would show you what one of my wonderful work buddies bought me as I was leaving! Look at this! If you press her paw she says "welcome to star schmucks may I take your order please?"!!!!!! She even found her a wig so she had red plaits like me!!!! Thanks Sadie!
Winner : @SWBrewery - James, Andy, just keep doing what you're doing, never stop!
Jose Espinal, 31
While walking through New Jersey I met a veterinarian oncologist named Joshua Louis who in addition to devoting his life to companion animal cancer is a singer and songwriter, too. It was trail magic when our paths crossed and we began collaborating on a 'Puppy up!' song to share the inspiration from our travels. Dr. Joshua, as he's known, is a gifted pianist, soulful singer, and helped capture the spirit of our mission. He wasn't able to walk the final mile in Boston so I took his place on the stage and gave er all I got.
I’m pretty much open to any genre. I don’t have any specific tastes and I don’t understand people who only read one or two types of books. With that being said, my favorite genres are John Hughes styled films, heroic bloodshed, and horror. What I ultimately look for in a book, though, are memorable characters and interesting relationships.
The message of this story is simple and profound; ‘We are all in possession of something unique and powerful. Be who you are to rise to your fullest potential’.
November Glossybox.
There has been considerable controversy over recent comments by Dan Savage, a radical gay rights activist, when he said “we can learn to ignore the bulls–t in the bible..” The YouTube video of the event is below so you can watch it yourself. However this is not the first or the worst or most radical of this man’s hateful outbursts. He is also very outspoken on issues such as pedophilia.
I don’t like that the houses are waaaaay smaller. That closets really don’t exist. That most houses are attached to the houses on either side.
Prank fails:
I need to get back on track though. In New York, I was pretty shameless about eating, and my snug-jeans-be-damned attitude has carried over to Paris. In addition to my welcome-back pain aux raisins the other morning, I’ve had no compunction about eating whatever I want, whenever I’m hungry: cereal at 5 in the morning (the jet lag—I wake up, starving), double fistfuls of cashews at 11 in the morning, Twizzlers as I prop myself in front of my computer at 10 at night. Nor have I been drinking enough water, and I haven’t exercised in three weeks. Once again, I’m getting winded from my six flights up to the treehouse. Not good.
The windows. When we first moved in there were the kind of windows that crank out. They didn't work very well, and some handles were missing, and even when they were open it didn't feel to me like the windows were open.
“Since then an insignia of Wojtek carrying an artillery shell, has adorned the uniform and vehicles of his comrades in the Polish 22nd Transport Company. At the end of the war Wojtek retired to live at Edinburgh Zoo, and there are still those who can remember him enjoying cigarettes there.” Bears swigging beer and smoking fags – that would no doubt be classed as animal cruelty nowadays.
Finally, the headline act – McFly. They ran through an incredible set consisting of great song after great song, big hit after big hit. Throw in the awesome new songs, and the superb cover medley, and there was enough to get everyone in the crowd going. There were smiles on everyones faces, and it was a brilliant thing to see. They’re totally worth catching live if you get the chance.
That night, I also found this precious photo of Brice! HA! His first little league pic... his mom had written on the back that he was upset because he had to miss morning cartoons! I'm pretty sure I need a little boy one day that looks just like this!
There are no easy solutions, but I think the short answer is, "Where possible, legalize it; when it's morally impossible to legalize it, do everything you can to reduce regulatory gaps." In other words, efforts like CITES for wildlife smuggling, or the Basel Convention for waste flows (to cite two examples), are on the right track — though the latter has huge loopholes and the former doesn't address capacity issues.
bring out the divinely revealed reality of the Father manifested in the person Jesus and his works.
The reason I originally turned on word verification was to stop an avalanche of spam. Following a complaint, I experimentally turned it off again, but the spam flood resumed, so it went back on again about 18 hours later.
The kitchen equipments hate me. And I’m scared of a toaster. Go figure.
The Deluxe model also features an interior light, a motion alarm in case someone tries to move it, and low battery indicator. Ours is also bolted in place. If someone tries to randomly enter access codes, it automatically deactivates the keypad-operated lock for a specified amount of time.
You grab at anything in your reach, and if it is something you really want you will roll to get it. You're obsessed with your wipes case...it has Nemo on it. Needless to say, changing your diaper has become quite a challenge! haha
I love coffee. It's what I drink when I'm not drinking beer.
SS501‘s Park Jung Min has put in an official request to have his exclusive contract nullified.
“You can do it. Believe. There’s no such word as Can’t.”
Books are plentiful and the words of men are endless…absolutely endless. All the collections of works and words, who can find the end? Be mindful in your search for knowledge; remember that your capacity to retain will far exceed your strength to obtain. In all our many tasks, both great and small there must be balance. In your quest to find truth, just remember to live, live, live the truth you have found so far. For life is so much more than a great study meet; it doesn’t consist of an endless search for answers in books, and words, and writings. Life consists of our deliberate desire to love God with our whole heart, which is displayed in a willingness to honor and serve Him with our entire life.
We hope you enjoy the vavoom and do a little dancing today.
Even if it’s not yet affordable and you can only dream about having professionally landscaped grounds around your home, attend a home and garden show. The ideas that you’ll walk away with and be able to implement yourself will be amazing.
1 pillars
- 4-5 med/large potatoes
I had a wretched night's sleep with these stitches in my head and on any other day I'd be off for a sugary frappe and pastry, but instead, I got on the scale and was thrilled to see another pound down.
I didn’t know there was a difference between correctors and concealers till just recently and it has been life-changing to the way I do my makeup now. Concealers are aimed at hiding any blemishes, discoloration (sun spots, hyper-pigmentation, etc.), acne, and to brighten up the underneath of your eyes… but what about dark circles? Concealers aren’t enough, they will typically make your under eyes look washed out or gray and that ain’t pretty!
I took her hand,
A Delta flight made an emergency landing in New York yesterday after engine problems the pilot said were caused by a bird strike. If birds didn’t taste so good the planes wouldn’t eat them.
Her husband did seem like a controlling jerk. He was in fact 12 years older than her as she previously told me. But the +12 made him mid-50's instead of mid-40's as she originally implied. In addition to being a jerk apparently he had let himself go as well, didn't do any housework, and expected her to cook for him every night, etc. She said "we haven't done anything (sex) in forever." She followed that with "he hates me" and that she thought he might be having an affair as well. I told her we needed to get he and Shannon together, they would be one caustic couple. She laughed.
Considering you will easily spend 400 quid over the weekend too.
The performances in In The Bedroom have that sort of hypnosis. They draw you in with little subtleties. The wandering eye-lines, stuttering dialog, and inconsistent intonations all serve to take the perception of intellect out of the action. Real people are impulsive. We rarely think about the little things we do. Any heavily rehearsed action is easily discernable because of how clean and deliberate it is.
which brings me closer to you,
Melissa Launay's illustrations richly develop the themes and mood of the text. The settings bring to mind all that we love about spending time in nature. While they are not specific places, they draw children into imagining what it would be like to sit under a tree, watch lions roar, or swim with dolphins.
Because we all also already know that contentment isn’t really about external circumstances. How else do you explain unhappiness among the wealthy, sadness in suburbia, self-esteem issues among beautiful people, etc. Those who seemingly have all the world has to offer still know deep in their souls that what is on the outside is just that. Outside. It is the inside and in our hearts where our lives are changed.
It started last week, when Beloved and I where walking home from the pub, and he commented that CS was standing down as the office manager at our local festival. He then said ‘could you do it?’, I answered ‘probably’ , as I said I wasn’t really paying attention, was far more interested in my painful joints and getting home to some painkillers.
Yeah. I know. There’s not much here. I started this thinking there would be some inspiration, and then the lib would really take off. But, there wasn’t. Maybe in the future, as more people work out problems with responsive design, this will be more than a few small functions.
Yo peeps, I still have one last Xmas gift for you all -- the Paris Proust Files interview with Beth Arnold!!
Bean: Hmmmm (runs off to play)
Black Friday
I went away from the clinic with eyes shiny. I hated that day. I wandered, which is what I do when I am trying to out-run thoughts that are dark, and tomorrows that might be worse than today.
How genteel of a person love would be,
Have a happy week :) ...(I'm not sure why this is in italics)...naughty blogger again I guess
This painting, "From the Bluffs" was juried into a Southern California Plein Air Painters Exhibit. Here's the info:
In opposition to all this, our text, like many others in the word of God, teaches us – if we suffer ourselves to be taught so strange a truth, so hard a lesson, – that he best considers himself who considers the poor rather than himself, and makes it his chief business in the world to communicate good unto his fellow-men. For the poor have a friend; even God the source of all good; and there is no more direct way to the heart of God than to alleviate the sufferings of our fellow-men, to deny ourselves for the good of others.
I recently got the chance to talk to Juan Riedinger about his role in ‘Grave Encounters’. Here, Juan talks about how he got involved in the project and what it was like working with the cast and crew on-set…
-Has big feet/ long toes
It is a measly $2.99 here at Amazon. That's less than Starbucks charges for just standing around and smelling a triple grande non-fat latte. I have priced it so low for you -- the glorious 99%!
I’m not for sale.
Yeah, it is irony when it takes me longer to tell you about the vacation than it did to experience it. But that's what happens when you have a lot of plays involved.
I love the National Women’s Health Network for its mission to promote a critical analysis of health issues, its insistence upon evidence, its mission to reflect the health needs of a wide diversity of women, and its core belief that women’s normal physiological changes should not be unduly medicalized (as the pharmaceutical industry so passionately, tirelessly insists they should be). And yes, that does mean we’re probably all going to have to get older just as nature intended. Sorry.
Now imagine if we took something like Zite and added another another layer to show you what types of jobs exist. Not that the job is available (the fluctuation of openings would make it too difficult). It would be a great step in pushing you to not be scared of your kid's dreams.
A framed chalkboard panel with an Eiffel tower is a very smart idea.
But it's not whiskey, and it's not moonshine.
Assistant General Secretary, TUC
David was an unknown Shepherd boy who became a King, He even wrote,
New York, NY— On January 6, 2012, Marcquel McDuffy, 22, was stabbed in the head and chest with a pen knife following a wrestling match with a friend in Fort Greene’s Farragut Houses (NYCHA). According to the victim’s brother, Mr. McDuffy and the suspect (Keylester Williams) had no known conflict between them. Both parties were reportedly inebriated during the attack, which took place around 9:30PM.
what a year this is turning out to be!
Yes. Because only male dogs sniff my crotch.
Also, we changed the location last minute both because one of the desserts was a white chocolate mousse cake and there was concern of it dissolving, but also because there was a storm coming in. Yes. With large, angry black clouds. The kind of weather that you see and run indoors for a cup of cocoa... not the kind of weather you see and grab all the pink glass you own to run outside and set up a tea party. So we were racing against the clock before we even headed to a local park. (This is where I say another big thank you to Heather for her "apres" work on the editing and making it look MUCH sunnier than it was.) All of the above shots are the setting up of the table... all of the below shots are what was accomplished in the few minutes we had before the sky tore itself open and poured torrents down... Luckily by that time the cakes had been consumed :)
*to attract new customers
3. Place spoonfuls on a lined baking tray allowing lots of room for spread and bake for 10 mins at 180C.
6And I saw the woman drunken with the blood of the saints, and with the blood of the martyrs of Jesus: and when I saw her, I wondered with great admiration.
When I wished her Happy Anniversary! at the breakfast table this morning she stared at me for a moment and then rested her forehead in her hand like she suddenly had a horrible headache. She had a caged animal look about her and, after regaining the power of speech, said, "Christ, has it been THAT long?"
even to the dull and the ignorant;
Did you know that, in August, State Farm opened a coffee house in downtown Chicago called Next Door (www.nextdoorchi.com)? One of the things they provide is financial coaching—at a coffee house. Do you know anyone who has recently graduated college and drinks coffee? So, it is not about changing the product, but simply changing its packaging. Life insurance is absolutely still relevant. But unless we change the way we talk about this concept with the next generation, our message may never be heard. And the generation of children that follow may be the victims of our inability to crawl out from under the rock.
Despite the fact last week was one of those weeks where nothing really happens, I managed to watch a few episodes of my favourite summer anime, namely No.6 & Usagi Drop. I spent the rest of the days travelling and watching a tv series called “Samantha Who?”(therapeutic, I must say).
It will be our second weanling to go to auction, and it's so hard, I planned the mating that produced him, I cared for his mum leading up to conception, I drove his mum to meet her 'date' (yes I feel a bit like a pimp!), I cared for his mum for the 11 months of her pregnancy, was there when he was born, helped him have his first drink, cleaned his mum up after he was born.
For people who can’t help themselves anymore, and for them to complain and bitch about my generation being lazy and complacent is a complete hypocritical understatement to say the least.
4 - Another male tourist, this time on holiday in Majorca, claimed that the number of bikini-clad women on the beach caused a fall-out between him and his wife, as he was caught ogling them 'on more than one occasion.'
9. If you are unhappy with an article, tell me why and we can fix the first draft for free.
The NCD and USCatholic must be struggling in coming up with legitimate sources to present their cases if they're now relying on teenagers and family members. They must have exhausted their rolodex of go-to folks for analysis and punditry. So who's going to be next? The water meter reader? The girl at the Tim Horton's drive thru?
In the end I found the recipe below which sounded like something I might enjoy eating. It also helped that the recipe came from a trusted name in cookery – Delia Smith.
I love you, Daddy
No, the strangest gift I ever received was from my first boyfriend's mother and aunt. I was very close to his family. They considered me a daughter. So for my birthday, they took me to a fancy restaurant and after we ordered, they presented me with a bag with tissue paper in it. In retrospect, that should have been my first clue! I pulled out 2 shirts that were identical except for the color. They could've been considered a little whore-ish, as they were both slightly see through, but I thought, hey, I can throw a tank top under it and make it work. Then I pulled out the final gift. A sweater. Only it wasn't just a sweater... it was a cow sweater. And I'm not talking one of those funny little kid shirts with cows in a pasture. No, I am talking full on black and white look like they shaved Bessy, sowed this thing together and gave it to me.
But since Miss 12 tak nak makan spaghetti and fettucine takde stock, terpaksalah I guna short pasta.
I have another inexpensive and oh, so easy gift you make. Great to leave hanging on your neighbors door, or another cute hostess gift! You've probably seen this before, but here it is again.
Taste: 9/10
Now, there are certain people I always trust when they tell me something is good. My mother-in-law is one of them. This salad was delicious. Fresh mixed greens, crunchy candied pecans, tangy goat cheese and asparagus – deliciously fresh sauteéd asparagus.
a lovely post about the end was near. this morning on the ipad gizmo. and it didn't post. at any rate, the end is truly near and I'm pretty darn calm.
You can see that I went over the edges a little bit, on the knee of the front horse and under his chin, but that's what the colorless blender is for.
The Andromeda Alliance, never ones to be seen as sound of mind on any day, good or bad, had been picking at us with small skirmishes up until that point, almost like trying to carve through our defences with little more than a chisel, and only then did they throw a hell of a jackhammer our way: a hundredfold extra footsoldiers emerged from the sea like the dreaded fish-people you hear about in 20th-century horror stories, backed up by as many as fifty 54-ARK amphibious tanks and a couple of 57-OMP bipedal assault suits marching across the continental shelf like it were a paddling pool.
May 3 – Myth (St. Paul, MN) #
Collectin... A few more blues rescued from the barn, they cleaned up nicely. The oldest of this lot dates to 1858, amazing they survived the collapse.
2) A traditional attempt to tar the protesters as a threat to stability.
God, I hate Sex and the City for reasons too complicated and long-winded to go into here, but the Cosmo was made popular by the show and people seem to like it.
Steven Gould is the author 8 Science Fiction books including the just released 7th Sigma and the New York Times best-seller Jumper, which was made into a movie not too long ago. He has been nominated for many awards for his short fiction including for the Nebula and Hugo Awards. 7th Sigma takes us to a time close to our own, but to part of America that has been changed by metal eating bugs turning the land back closer to that of the Old West.
Stir in the basil and what salt and pepper you feel it needs.
I’m hoping to attend my first writer’s conference in Atlanta in October, using the money from my new part-time job. So, oh, yeah, there are the hours that I am now working.
leadership to the team that drafts him, having been named a team captain for his senior season, and was also a two-time captain in high
Peter Turnbull – Jack the Ripper: Man or Myth
Fast forward to this spring. After yet another unseasonably warm Arctic winter, Russian scientists are busy studying the methane releases reported last fall, and initial reports – well, let’s understate things considerably and call them “rather troubling.” Areas of open water up to a
Remember when U-2 was considered a Christian Group?
A year before, I have used a similar setting as in the first photo, but used a plain black background (see photo below). And although I like this shot, I thought the angle was to leveled and the background is missing some structure. The plain black is killing a bit dimension and also atmosphere. It seems a bit artificial.
I have to climb
And then I added the dissolved cocoa mixture into the chocolate-caramel mixture, for an even more chocolate intensity. Truthfully, I was missing the caramel. If you were given your choice between a beautifully homemade truffle and a beautifully homemade caramel, which would you take? I'd be sad to miss the truffle, but I'd take the caramel.
I taught Entrelac to a group of adventurous knitters, including the fabulous Doreen who told me that mastering the technique was on her bucket list. I think by the end of the day she had it crossed off!
Isn't this kit yummy? Wouldn't it be great if there were a bundle for all of the fantastic extra goodies?
Now that I am an experienced blogger having written one whole blog, I was wondering what the next post would be. My answer came on a recent 45 minute flight when a lady sat down next to me.
This, my friends, really got me excited! It was wrapped in foil, really hot, really really amazing! Like one of the wonders of the world! Without further ado, I would like to introduce you to TOMBSTONE!
Sincerely, Howard and Rex.
Acts 27:23, Part 1
To my surprise, I believe his voice was filled with...
The system was put into place because back in the old world, breweries owned pubs, mucking up the free flow of beer to the market (a Guinness-owned pub wasn't going to be selling a whole lot of Beamish, or worse, the new micro from Paddy O'Malley over in Dún Laoghaire, who might find it very difficult to get his Oyster Stout to the public). The American system is called "three-tiered," as opposed to the one it replaced, known as "tied house." It resolved one real-world problem, the power of breweries, but created another.
#2 List your 5 all-time sexiest male actors.
It fell to the table twitching, foetid dust spilling from severed arteries.
I had another busy week with mom and next week will be busy too. I was in Orientation two days for my new part-time job and I am waiting to hear about my interview results for a full-time position that I am very interested in.
These statements represent just a fraction of the evidence we have in our possession, consisting of numerous similar transactions through Chia controlled bank accounts, involving a number of timber companies with concessions in Sabah.
Even if he die,
It's too late for mushy "we need to have a conversation" talk. You and many of your fellow British know perfectly well who shouldn't be there. Your oppressors believe they don't need to bother having a conversation with you.
So far this system is working out very well. Have any of you tried this type of homework plan?
Her clothes were torn, her bedraggled hair wild
Tammy and I both struggled in the studio on Thursday. I'm blaming the humidity. I think I managed to get only one decent piece in the annealer; Tammy may have done a little better. But that's okay because it only makes us more determined to show up again for our next session at the bench and try even harder.
The captain was a little stubborn too. Captain Smith had a record to break and influential passengers to cater to. Could you imagine the praise he'd receive if he made it to New York in record time? The folks in first-class were some of the wealthiest in the world, and he would be their hero.
This time of year is always really stressful; getting everything ready for the start of the fall semester and the switching around of my schedule--it takes me several weeks to settle into a new rhythm. Plus, after my husband's illness I really needed a good week off.
Well plan a trip golden triangle and visit three important tourist destinations at a time. It is a budget and most exciting options to explore the rich heritage of the country. You can also take help of professional tour operators to plan your trip.
But of course, it’s never that easy ! The entertainer, who was mailed a cheque for the deposit, claimed she never got it (she later found it in a flower pot, into which the mail had fallen by accident, the paper soaked and the ink runny); the stuff for the goodie bags that I bought from a party store in Middle Road (where I went in the hope of securing some bargains, only to find it more expensive than the party shop next door) was not enough and I couldn’t find anyone to do two Disney themed cakes because of copyright issues. So with only a few days to go, nothing was in order.
T he Lord is asking us today, "Do you want to be made well?" Whether it be physical healing, spiritual, emotional or financial healing, no thing is too great or too small for our Lord!
﻿﻿The streets inside the Old City were filled with street vendors selling rice, spices, fabrics, bangles, vegetables... anything you could imagine. Every corner held some new treasure. We spent hours taking in the energy and colours. ﻿
All of this is unimaginably fabulous.
With your head upon my shoulder
Like The Common Good and Shared Humanity.
This is short, but I wanted to get a post in since it is part of my accountability system. I didn’t want everyone to think I had fallen off the wagon.
Amazing Grace, how sweet the sound,
The real test lately has been that of patience. I have no idea what I'm doing next year. I know where I'm going, yeah, which presents all its own challenges, but what am I actually doing? Do I have a job? An internship? A place to live? Nope. Still waiting to hear back from people about things. Graduation is coming up, and I know I'm not the only one in this boat.
The other thing he needs to do is compose lists after lists to organize himself. He has to do lists daily and when it came to getting ourselves organized to move into our house he created so many lists I lost track of it all. The lists were made up of all the things we needed to buy to paint, things we needs to paint, things we had, things we needed, things we knew we were getting for Christmas etc… ok maybe I’m exaggerating, but he made a lot of lists. I like to just go with it.
This book is not simply a story of sports. Sure, if you are a sports fan, you’ll love the behind the scenes details of the ESPYs, the cameos of sports superstars as they drop in Bristol to film Sports Center commercials, and the retelling of great moments in sports as they were perceived by the crew and staff at ESPN. This is also a business history book. From go, the authors put us in the backseat as we eavesdrop on a conversation between Bill and Scott Rasmussen as the father-and-son duo dream up the concept for a 24-hour cable news channel. Miller and Shales treat this with no less importance than when Bill Gates started tinkering around in his garage. Just thirty years later, ESPN is the crown jewel in the Disney/ABC empire and a cultural touchstone that connects the world. The business decisions that turned out to be steps in their march toward “world dominance,” as the authors call it, are the foundation of this book, and they are as interesting as any highlight of a great sporting event.
He Stood Solid as a Mountain, and Said the Two Parts of the Shahada
These Wildflower Seed Bombs are such a fantastic idea from Cookin' Up Good Times. (I secretly thought they were delicious chocolate truffles, they look so good.) What a wonderful idea and great for a gift too. Thanks so much for submitting all your beautiful recipes last week too. Just gorgeous!
He waved that away and turned to Damian. “Brother, welcome to manhood. Come on, we’re getting our sister back.” With that, he turned on his heel, the brothers leaving Kira standing open-mouthed in front of the cottage.
The merry-go-round of freelance life was making me giddy and a little nauseous and then, without warning, I was thrown off onto the grassy verge of no work. For a week at least.
4. SKRITCH by John Blackport
despite the 10 months we have known this date.
House in West Sussex – Adam Richards Architects, London N1.
There were “assaults all over the detainees’ bodies, under their feet and buttocks through the use of broomsticks, metal rods, pieces of timber, open palms and some blunt objects,” The Zimbabwean newspaper reports, in an account of the court proceedings.
S: Always a success; they can be very hierarchical.
Thanks White Lily for a great ‘light’ yeast roll recipe! This isn’t necessarily an endorsement as I normally buy name brand flour but select whatever is on sale.
There was one kid in The Fort whose English was as good as mine. Not that mine is perfect, but for a 10 (or so) year old, I was always surprised to hear him talk so well. He didn’t attend school, but knew the story of the Palace on The Fort very well and spoke Spanish, Hindi and Italian besides English. Billy, talked to everyone! He has a great personality and I’m sure and really hope he does great things as he grows up.
14. AYOR
Coming soon: Mikey Boy has been working hard on our bathroom, and he has completed tiling the countertop. Hooray for hubby! Pictures will be forthcoming once it's a bit cleaned up, as we need help choosing what kind of a floor to go with.
8. Turmeric powder, ¼ teaspoon.
“Elizabeth didn’t leave me on her own.” Grayson swung his gaze to Doyle. “She was abducted.”
Records: Fox Lane 9-1; Mamaroneck 4-6
They said Bersih’s complete disregard of EC’s positive response in adopting some of the Bersih-endorsed recommendations made by the PSC proved the allegation that the April 28 demonstration was made even before the report was produced.
Easy. Take your time...
December 23, 2011 Friday
So, since that retarded incident, I have not been WordPressing, Adobe-ing or other things much. I get to a computer when I can. Library, cellphone (whatever I can do on it that my mobile can allow, anyway…Wordpress not one of those things) and, in fact, I am typing this up on my boyfriend’s laptop. What a guy! He’s awesome!
1 side of salmon, ask your fish monger to filet, skin-on and have pin bones removed
Hoping that she will be able to sleep at least a few hours, but then i know that the meds will loose their effect...
Paint over winter's canvas
After his mother had finished spitting blood and feathers amongst the mild-mannered chavs who were trying to have a quiet meal, she stormed out of the establishment. Left alone with his father, GBT Joe quickly learned that there would be no sympathy from him, for it is indeed easier to side with a psychopathic mother than a son who might have a fair point. Joe decided it would be better if he went on somewhere else, rather than risk going home that night.
eh ? What makes me ? Ok I didnt understand the question and I mailed Usha to ask what does she want to know.. then I read what Sandhya answered and my answer after that is…
Rating: 5/6
I’m eternally grateful that Christ did not think like that. If He had, then I’d still be dead in my sins, because He would not have chosen to die for my sins.
Well, Rebecca....you are going to see this Mama running around the neighborhood a lot more often over the next few months!!! :)
Happy Saturday and Happy National Scrapbooking Day - I definitely intend to scrap today. Am finishing up a page for Core'dination's later this month. Watch their blog - we have some fabulous projects and pages to show you this month. Got so many fun goodies to play with!
We are getting some clarity on this now, and just starting to produce IFC file output which we are sharing with one or two architects and main contractors. I eagerly await their feedback over the next few weeks, before committing to a portfolio approach
It isn't just economic diversity and maturity that makes the European Union - and specifically that more important part, the 24 nations of the eurozone - a handful. Our nation states have their own histories and political inheritances to integrate.
We realize that some women, through no fault of their own, are not able to bear children. To these lovely sisters, every prophet of God has promised that they will be blessed with children in the eternities and that posterity will not be denied them.
3. Women’s 1500 at U.S. Nationals – I’m sure some are scratching their heads on this one, but I found it extremely disappointing that someone could run the gutsy race that Christin Wurth Thomas ran and NOT get a chance to run at Worlds. After taking the pace out a la Paula Ivan in Seoul ’88, Wurth Thomas missed making the team by .01sec! Further strengthening my feelings that a “Real” Worlds where the best are invited regardless of country.
Pevan blinked. "Actually, I was just thinking that couldn't be the whole story. If you were crazy, maybe, but you don't look like it."
1. Mix packet of jelly with enough hot water, little by little until mixture is consistency of paint.
I put the baby down and stroked his hair so he could sleep.
Italian Thistle
485990 Other transit & ground passenger transportation
And there, dear reader, you have it. Anna’s dastardly plan right from the beginning was to end the trip in Paris so that she can fill the empty suitcase. With clothing. And other French stuff. Probably even a handbag or two. Hah!
All that said, I read this " latest" book - actually he has at least 1 newer out.
Source
here's another image I did some days ago.
Become a role model
Artist : Max Cassilly – saltwater trickster / swt
Waiting for the End of the World
PMcC – As was commented on by the Lallands Peat Worrier Mr Watson’s comments about the conviction are unhelpful, in that he failed to identify any way in which, legally, that was the case. Mr Coulson, for example, was a defence witness, as was, effectively, Mr Wight. Their testimony had nothing to do with the conviction, and the wide cross examination of them, as mentioned above, was irrelevant to the case, though not to Mr Sheridan’s feelings about the good conduct of the NotW.
I love that when you get nervous you squeeze my hand,
- Furniture (well, the crib at least!) to be built
It has been found that at least half of the world population believes in the existence of angels, guardian angels and other spiritual beings, but what are angels? Are they real? Do they really exist or are they a figment of our imagination? All of these questions and more will be answered in this chapter.
the whites of their thighs
For most of human existence, we lived as hunter-gatherers, leaving one place when the easy food had been exhausted to find new grounds for hunting and gathering. Only very recently in the human journey have we lived as farmers. The move from nomadic hunting and gathering to the settled life of farming must have seemed radical indeed. As Jared Diamond points out in his 1987 article "The Worst Mistake in the History of the Human Race," farming arose because of increasing population pressures. Whereas some groups chose farming over limiting their numbers, others stuck with hunting and gathering. But the vastly superior number of people in farming communities eventually led to the extinction of all but a few remaining hunter-gatherer communities on Earth.
At first I took my weight to be an anchor
Most of these new bars are targeted at the younger end of the market and have little to offer the more mature pubgoer. They don’t have the across-the-board appeal of proper pubs. And, although there are some honourable exceptions, most offer nothing of interest on the beer front. What is more, how can a small, boxy converted shop be regarded as any kind of acceptable substitute for an impressive Victorian or inter-wars building that was full of character and had served its community over several generations through a succession of licensees? Most will be fly-by-night operations with a limited lifespan and no continuity.
Those are the biggies. Best of luck with the rest, stay informed, and make your voice heard. More later,
I have gotten into hot water for recommending this book to couples.
Do not feel envious of the happiness of those who live in a fool's paradise, for only a fool will think that it is happiness.
and all we feel is left out in the cold,
The code can only be used once per customer.
OK, that's it for now! I'm so excited and can't wait for June 1st! I hope to see you there and, just in case you missed it before:
542 W Grant Place
Many people have left Tokyo in fear of possible radiation and constant after shocks.
HIPS
We are located at 3620 Falls Road in Baltimore Maryland, inside of Atomic Books.
My shots started to come together on my third day in a busy district of Tsim Sha Tsui. I was adjusting the distance with my focus ring from time to time to get my shots. The focus ring works when you know your distance with the subject. That’s about it. Fuji has to work on their focusing mechanism. Even the new X-Pro1 is suffering the same quirkiness. I could only imagine one day Fuji has a snap focus function like in Ricoh.
This is a great opportunity to try – at a discount – the eye shadow duo and tinted brow gel.
Teff
Take it out and let cool for a minute or two. *remember the stone will be HOT! Take care when removing*
But after Landon Phoenix, the high school hottie, dies in Xylia's arms, she sneaks into the morgue to say goodbye. How could she know stealing a kiss from his corpse would wake him up?
The auction is on the Dec. 7th and 8th overseen by the Auctioneer Piasa, and prices range from 10 Euro to 2,500 to 3,000 euro.
William never minds stopping to enable my shopping and/or photography, and he happily translates for me when I’m asking people for permission to take their picture. On our 3-hour journey, we saw hundreds of Muslims on their way to mosque, because as William explained, it was Eid al-Adha, a celebration of the trials and sacrifices of Abraham.
Week 2 of training has gone well. My "challenge" run this week was an interval run. I started with a 1 mile warmup, then I moved on to 1 mile at 8:30 min/mile, followed by 1/2 mile jog, then repeat. I finished it up with a 1 mile jog at the end to cool down. I have to say, I was a bit nervous about this one! I am only slowly starting to realize that I am physically capable of running faster than a 10 minute mile. It's super fun actually! It really has invigorated me. I was getting to a point where my runs/workouts weren't stress relieving anymore, but when I push myself and reach new heights, I love the way that feels! So all in all, I am really enjoying this! I have a 6 mile run this weekend which will most likely occur before 7 AM tomorrow. It's going to be a hot one again!
And yet . . . and yet. I hesitate. It's not the fact that the house needs TLC that makes me pause. That has never scared me before. In fact, Mr. Magpie and I have bought two homes before, and both times we jumped in without a second thought. We made an offer on our first home after looking for just one day. Our offer was accepted and we were moved into the house in a month's time. We bought the second home, a loft in an old textile mill, while it was still under construction. In fact, it was basically just a white box with some windows overlooking a canal the day we made our offer. That's how we've always rolled when it comes to buying homes. We love it, so we take the leap.
I was interested in how GA was progressing for a lot of reasons. My book Small Loans, Big Dreams extensively examined one of the earliest microfinance programs in the United States, the Full Circle Fund. While doing that research, my eyes were opened for the first time to the vibrancy of the grassroots economy in many inner-cities. Later, I became involved in microfinance institutions in the United States that Grameen Foundation also supported: Project Enterprise in New York City, the PLAN Fund in Dallas and the New Opportunities program of Volunteers of America in Los Angeles. Though the LA program was phased out, the other two continue providing microfinance effectively while drawing on the Grameen Bank model extensively. However, they operate on a relatively small scale, even as they try to serve a lower-income population (including many African-Americans) than other microfinance and microenterprise programs here serve.
12/27/2011 BUY 0.01 usdjpy 77.859 02/14/2012 78.382 +6.67
I have mentioned my disdain for beer in clear bottles several times here on the blog, but a reader's recent comment prompted me to elaborate on this.
Several lifetimes ago when I was in my New Romantic year, I would be stood-standing at a bus stop in a frilly shirt or be walking through town in knickerbockers when the ‘yoof’ of my youth would call out ‘Peace man’, giving the standard John Lennon Salute with two inoffensive fingers.
The proposed DSM-V wording raises numerous specific concerns; I will mention two. One is that it enshrines the false and harmful assumption, an assumption showing a striking absence of reciprocity on the part of the DSM-V committee, that if autistics communicate or interact in atypical and possibly very adaptive ways, then this communication or interaction must be defective or wrong, or must not exist at all. Another concern is that by using words such as “rituals,” the DSM-V is perpetuating the misconstrual of autistics’ focused abilities and interests (and motor mannerisms). This misconstrual led to the demonstrably false and harmful assumption that autistics’ atypicalities in this area amount to “obsessions” and must be treatable in the same manner as OCD (see recent failed citalopram RCT, King et al., 2009; a failed fluoxetine RCT has been announced by Neuropharm and Autism Speaks, but not published yet).
I do try to understand other points of view and try to help bring people together with love and understanding.
But I think I’ve found something that is simple and to the point….
In Istanbul, every spot is near the sea so this scene will not surprised people who have seen Istanbul before. And they will be known there is a huge crowded city behind me. Silence and Metropol are looking eachother, which one do you chose?
Bo
I have since decided to pick up a book used in RCIA (Rite of Christian Initiation of Adults) that I’ve had sitting on my bookshelf for years and have been reading a bit of it here and there. The first chapter, of course, deals with God calling humanity to a close relationship with him through the salvation offered through Jesus’ sacrifice. This led me to think about the divinity of Jesus. Do I personally believe that, if Jesus existed, he was divine? Not by any means do I believe that. This prompted me to double-check the facts as to what Catholics and other Christian denominations believe as far as Jesus’ divinity goes; of course, Catholics believe Jesus was divine, seeing him as half-God, half-man, which automatically disqualifies me from even considering becoming Catholic, nevermind the blaring fact that Jesus isn’t the messiah.
How long on average does it take for you to produce a finished manuscript of drawings and words?
North Korea said last week it was ready to retaliate in the face of international condemnation over this month’s failed rocket launch, increasing the likelihood the hermit state will push ahead with a third nuclear test in defiance of U.N. sanctions.
Sadly another road trip is coming up soon and we no longer have any 5 and under jokesters. Ah well...I'm sure the 7yr old will not disappoint.
Me: She's not three anymore. She's seven. Old enough that she can be of help to you.
“No,” I answered.
1 small white onion, diced
Two unlikely worlds colliding, I pray, it happens again
Here's the great news...Kim is giving away three copies of her resource. Yes, that's right THREE copies. All you have to do is click the above picture to go straight to her giveaway instructions. But hurry...this giveaway closes on March 23rd!!
DAVID #2: That’s It’s a Wonderful Life.
The blog Dng Effect is again down temporarily for private reasons, so no feed error here.
And away went the hatching mother of the cold. — Carmina Gadelica
I cut out the small flowers with an EK Success Retro Flower punch. I used a decorative scissor for the petals and distressed them with Distress Ink Chipped Sapphire. I added some Puffy Velvet to give the flowers some dimension.
Because it's horrible and tacky.
This is about your reaction. If I tell someone that I am dairy free, the first question is why. My answer is I think I am allergic (if I know you) or I am allergic (if I don't). Some leave it at that and some say why do you think you are allergic, and since I am not one that really like "bathroom" talk I just say it messes me up. Most are satisfied with this answer and still others press. I go ahead and tell them the problem if they press and I know them well enough.
No concrete reasons have been figured out yet but the authorities believe that it could possibly be a viral infection that may have killed the dolphins in huge numbers. While environmental groups in the country blame the seismic oil exploration work carried out by BPZ Energy Company for the dolphin deaths.
Lunch: 1 cup brown rice with watercress dal and beetroot fry
The acting is hard to get a read on. Cüneyt Arkin as the inspector is really the only character you will get to know all that well. The man must have been doing something right as he has 270 acting credits, and I've read that he was actually in over 500 films. He certainly has a unique and cool Amitabh style about him. I'm almost certain he must have been as successful as he was due to his looks and suave demeanor... but that's OK. I was eating up a little myself. Despite some obvious undercranking for some ridiculously paced fights, he's pretty agile for a guy who would have been near 50 when this was filmed. Seeing him bounce on trampolines with silly looking spray painted swords is worth the price of admission.
Rates for homeowners insurance in April were up 1 percent—both for homes valued under $1 million and homes valued over $1 million. Auto rates were up 2 percent, and personal articles rates were up 1 percent.
My electrologist thought it was interesting. Although she saw Christen in the pictures I showed to her, she also saw what she thought was a guy in the mode I presented to her when at her office.
Yes, life is good.
Gotta go. There are calendars to update and kids to feed.
Vacuums Won’t Kill Them But Washers Will
It is popularly believed that The Beatles were the unbeaten king of the charts with 22 top ten hits; but Cliff Richard had 38. It’s true, however, that the Beatles were musical innovators with their sergeant pepper album, but two versions of the sound of music occupied the charts for over five years and sold more copies worldwide than the Beatles top seller, abbey road.
To give them credit, the coalition has tried to reform the planning system, proposing a ‘presumption of development’ (which sounds scary until you realise that most of England is not what you’d call ‘developed’) but this has been fought by various heritage and conservation groups, led by the idiotic Sir Simon Jenkins, and newspaper editors with second homes in the Cotswolds. What has emerged from the thrash of revision and debate is all over the place, a watered down framework that will probably do little for either housebuilding or the environment.
But that’s not what got me out in the yard. Nope, it happens every year. Just when I think I’ve lost any interest in gardening, the turn in the weather changes my mind. It’s kind of scary, actually, like an addiction to getting my hands dirty. (I was going to say “an addiction I can’t control,” but I’ve never really tried to control it, so I wouldn’t know.)
Price: Moderate
white pearl glimmer mist. used on the roses
This social satire is complete at 100,600 words. My work has been published in Kaleidoscope, American Heritage, Rosebud, and The Journal of Irreproducible Results.
My club had a table, somewhere. I looked around, but I didn't see it. I went in the dealer's room, not so much looking at the dealers, but looking around for my friends in case they had been moved to this room. I didn't see them. I ran into a few more friends and talked for a bit, then walked around looking again for the club table. I had walked back and forth the entire length of the place twice without seeing it. I found another friend, who pointed out the table for me. I hadn't seen it before because of all the people in the autograph line in front of it. Okay, mystery solved.
I have a complete first draft of novel no. 1 that just needs some major editing and revision. I started another novel because the first one is ridiculously sad and I needed something happy to write, sooooo, now there are two novels! I'd like to be able to put some more serious work into them.
A type of nut.
Secondly, Ananais was “a devout man according to the law.” That word, devout, meant that he was one who exhibited a holy awe of God and found expression in devoted activity. Here was a man devoted to the law and was going to Saul to put his stamp of approval upon him. He was devoted to the very thing these militant Jews were holding in accusation of Paul. From Acts 21:28, the main accusation was that Paul was teaching against the law and the temple. If Ananias supported him, shouldn’t they?
Sherman also made a couple other great points:
Stand by each other, side by side.
Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow: they neither toil nor spin”— they simply are! Think of the sea, the air, the sun, the stars, and the moon— all of these simply are as well— yet what a ministry and service they render on our behalf! So often we impair God’s designed influence, which He desires to exhibit through us, because of our own conscious efforts to be consistent and useful. Jesus said there is only one way to develop and grow spiritually, and that is through focusing and concentrating on God. In essence, Jesus was saying, “Do not worry about being of use to others; simply believe on Me.” In other words, pay attention to the Source, and out of you “will flow rivers of living water” (John 7:38). We cannot discover the source of our natural life through common sense and reasoning, and Jesus is teaching here that growth in our spiritual life comes not from focusing directly on it, but from concentrating on our Father in heaven. Our heavenly Father knows our circumstances, and if we will stay focused on Him, instead of our circumstances, we will grow spiritually— just as “the lilies of the field.”
This was the view in the morning from our motel window:
I can't wait to have fresh garden veggies!
the Bulgakov, (author of the wonderful ‘The Master and Margarita‘), was purchased after seeing a rather good National Theatre play on his life last month with my parents, as part of the series of plays broadcast live to cinemas across the world;
James Joyce was famous for the neologisms in Finnegans Wake (1939), which no doubt effectively prevented the book from reaching a wider audience, but to me are a delight of the English language. Alice in Wonderland, The Hunting of the Snark, A Clockwork Orange, most SF (John Brunner’s Stand On Zanzibar is a good example) and many Fantasy novels (Terry Pratchett’s Discworld novels and the Harry Potter stories as examples) are all laden with neologisms.
I usually counter-attack with "And when did you last visit a restaurant in the UK?" to which the reply is usually "Oh about 25 years ago," or "I never have but I stayed with a family in Bury on my exchange trip 30 years ago". Get with the programme, you guys. Of course none of them watch the delightful culinary shows on BBC. They know of Jammy Oliveurre but that's about it - whatever he might tell you to the contrary, Gordon Ramsay is totally unknown on this side of the channel, ditto Michel Roux Junior - even his dad Albert is better known in the UK than in his native France. Alain Ducasse, they know. The Troisgros brothers, they know. But Mention Raymond Blanc, or Ray White, as he is known to Oxfordshire locals, and you will be met with a blank stare and a Gallic shrug. And n'en parlons pas des Motards Poilus.
It’s a wonderful album, simply put—a series of 11 soundscapes with richly layered sound, gorgeous melodies & harmonies & shifting rhythms—& such rich layering is possible because Ms Keating has constructed multiple tracks, so that she becomes a one-woman cello orchestra. As a studio production, this would be impressive in itself—however, Zoë Keating is able to reproduce these performances live by simultaneously playing two instruments: her cello & a MacBook Pro. In the second video below, Ms Keating explains her looping technology in an interview with Wired. Suffice it to say that Zoë Keating’s compositions are all of a piece, from the melodic lines to the percussive effects.
Like Chico and Harpo, Jimmy Durante started out as a teenager playing piano in saloons. In the summers one of the places where he used to work was a Coney Island establishment called Cary Walsh’s. It was supposedly a very rough place—the kind of place where beer mugs go flying when the action gets too wild. As coincidence would have it, in the summer of 1908 or 1909, at around the same time Harpo was joining his brother onstage, in another part of Coney Island another future star was working at Cary Walsh’s dive at the same time as Durante: Eddie Cantor. He’s sadly almost unknown today, but in the 1920s and 30s there was nobody bigger in show business. He was easily as big as the Marx Brothers or Durante, but nowadays people just kind of scratch their heads when they see his schtick in films. At any rate, at the same time Durante was a piano player, Cantor was a singing waiter at three dollars a day. Their job was to be able to sing any song that any customer named. If they didn’t know the song, the drunken customer would be unruly, and the singer would likely be fired. So Durante and Cantor worked out a scheme between them. If they didn’t know the song, Durante would just vamp in an easy-to-reach key and Cantor would improvise lyrics around the song title. If the customer said, “Hey, that isn’t it!” Cantor would say, “You mean there’s two songs by that name?”
of torment–they grow hotter and more stifling.
The public will have a front row view of all the action, as the event has expanded in its fourth year to include more rockets, more exhibitors, and more activities.
Today, I went to both the dentist and my family doctor. The dentist visit was for a cleaning, and for once, the lady that cleaned my teeth was gentle. So it wasn't too bad.
What a great group of little learners at Montessori! This spring, we are in a unit called "Away We GO!" It is about all things that go go GO! So far, we have done trains (Ask your child about Shiny Dinah!), cars, horses, buses, and airplanes!
About how easy it is to sprinkle joy for my children just by choosing to set aside some work for a few moments and focus exclusively on them. About how my eyes have been opened to needs in my community that I was unaware of. About how my heart expanded with compassion and love when I walked through fear to reach out to people who are very different from me.
-Clothing occurence: medium *
You may have to adjust your photocopier contrast to get the best printout when you copy your line work. Make sure the contrast is high, so you don't lose any line darkness on areas where you may not have burnished the tones enough. If it copies too dark, then lower your contrast or increase your brightness.
There are also books and clothes for sale.
The first annual Brewer's Tasting Dinner will take place on the eve of the festival, April 26 at 7 p.m. This six-course tasting will be attended by participating brewers and industry insiders. Each course will be a small plate paired with a beer tasting from one of six area breweries. There are a limited number of tickets available to the public for $40 apiece.
Day 8: Do you feel you have more good days than bad ones?
It was important to many of our Founding Fathers to pass the Constitution. It wasn’t perfect but they all knew the importance of passing what they did. They knew if they set up the rule of law around basic natural human rights that much of the following law would fall into place. From the beginning of this country’s young history, the Constitution has been tested time and time again. Unfortunately, many of the initial decisions rendered by the Supreme Court may not have been completely in line with the principles of LIFE, LIBERTY, and PROPERTY as guarded by the Constitution. The Founding Fathers realized that early opinion precedent would have a snow ball effect on future law. This snow ball effect of decisions are the unintended consequences, also known as blowback, that have slowly bled this country dry of peace and prosperity. This country is on life support and we need to figure out our next move!
Then I saw the charts. There are oodles and oodles of charts for decorating hexipuffs. (I'll admit...it was the Dr. Who charts that really tilted the scales.) There's no stranded colorwork involved, as it can all be done with duplicate stitch. It was like the Heavens opened up and I heard the proverbial choir singing. Suddenly, I could see the whole next year stretching out in front of me, filled with hexipuffs.
On this day… when Britain had a change of prime minister and government, I amused myself with creating a ‘painting’… well.. more of a collage. It is, as with all my paintings, complete nonsense, but reflects attitudes to size and the importance and perception of size. Is it a big box of fags (cigarettes.. not some unusual creature at Eton) or a very small box of matches? Well… a bit like the Lib-Dems, sometimes… size really does not matter.
Before the world was created, in heavenly councils the pattern and role of women were prescribed. You were elected by God to be wives and mothers in Zion. Exaltation in the celestial kingdom is predicated on faithfulness to that calling. President Benson (“The Honored Place of Woman”, Ensign, Nov. 1981, 104)
yes, it's a small gesture, a symbolic act, but maybe, just maybe all of our small gestures, our symbolic acts will highlight how many people want a better quality of life for everyone.
Revision is tricky, because I do a lot of it longhand (so counting words would be a beast). Plus, the train wreck I'm fixing requires tossing entire chunks (we're talking entire chapters sometimes) of my rough draft. So in a day I might have tossed 10 pages and written 4 pages, which would give me a negative total.
On the stem of plants they are tiny green bugs that gross me out too much to post a photo of, google and you’ll see why. Mature aphids are white and fly which means they quickly move to other plants and take over a garden.
If someone comes up and does wrong to you, what is your natural instinct? For most people the first reaction is that of anger. I think anger is something many, many people have to work on. It’s an ongoing process. You’re not just going to wake up one day and decide that you can control your anger by yourself. It takes work and it takes God’s help. There’s a difference between controlling anger and bottling up anger. When you bottle up anger, the problem just grows. It can lead you to do something over the edge. Murderers don’t wake up one day and just randomly decide to kill someone. It usually starts out as a problem that was never taken care of. When you control, anger you are able to stop yourself from being controlled by the feeling itself. You can keep yourself from resorting to hatred or violence towards the person that made you angry. You don’t keep it inside, but you can get help. Counselors, pastors, and Christian friends/family are all people you can trust and get help from or just to get the feeling off your chest.
‘‘(A) require a private-sector entity to share information with the Federal Government; or
So here was the deal: $5 off with a $25 CAD order with free shipping. Plus a free weekender bag (or a free nourishing shampoo, free intense look duo, or 3 trees planted) with every order. Plus a free contemporary cuff watch with a $45 order.
You carry a great responsibility, do the right thing at this time by listening to your heart.
Some patches of ash, on the shoulders, did not melt and run, leaving a rough, raised patch.
Meanwhile, if somebody set up a radio station – perhaps called Dolby Earth – permanently dedicated to realtime platecasts of the earth's droning motions... at the very least I'd be a dedicated listener.
My second ebook "MAKE IT HAPPEN" soon to be published at Amazon Kindle, in EPUB format and Paperback format. Working on the last couple of chapters and is entirely different from "MY LIBRARY OF THOUGHTS" .....Happy Reading n Have a blessed day :)
“We’ve both completed a basic course in helicopter flight,” Manny replied, “but neither of us is a pilot.”
I also joined in with BlessedMama on using the MyFitnessPal website and I love it!!! I am logging all exercise and food everyday and it is free and sooooooooo easy and I have YET to try to enter a food that is not in their database...LOVE IT!
I better enjoy it this week, because the week after I head back to Belize. It will be nice to have a job that doesn't involve scrubbing toilets. I hope mi vampiro is drinking up his baba root and his tiger bone. I have a feeling all this resting is going to give me quite an energy boost.
Eventually, they all went down to the furnace and, together, rolled his body in. But by then they were ready to let him go…which I realized was the ceremony’s intended gift.
I’m sure if I was making a living off my writing, I’d define myself as a writer. And if I won the Nobel Prize, I might. But still . . . I blog more than I write creatively, but I don’t call myself a blogger. I promote more than I blog, but I don’t consider myself a promoter. I sleep more than I promote, but I don’t call myself a sleeper. (Though some people might.)
The first meaning we can find at the core of real joy is in the letter “J.” And that is true faith in the Lord, God Jehovah via a relationship with His Son, Jesus Christ. (Jehovah is one of the forms of the Hebrew name for God.) As we studied earlier, all of us are sinners. To be a sinner is to be an arrow that has missed its mark or center, or to put it more clearly, missed the bull’s-eye. All of mankind was intended to exist in the center of God’s will and purpose. Sin, which was introduced into our lives via the “fall of man” in the garden of Eden (Genesis 3:1-24), disrobed and removed God’s glory from mankind. Sin left us naked, vulnerable, and dying. There was no way the human race would ever be living in the center of God’s will and purpose ever again without divine intervention. A deep and true faith in God, via a relationship with His Son, Jesus Christ, is the only way humans can return to living in the center of Jehovah’s will and purpose. Let’s look over how we can have such a faith in God, before we move on.
Sooo... Frank is coming home. Another yay! We miss him a lot. He'll be back a week from tomorrow. Cheaper fares then, and he'd like some time with his dad knowing it's just a visit and not a good-bye.
Max works in security. Danusia is working on her doctorate theses. She's young, smart, sexy and confused. The info she's reading isn't matching the results she expected and when her apartment is broken into again, Max goes into protection mode.
Gave him What For.
Back to the quote above: I consider this phenomenon of people (often men) losing their individuality and friends once they become part of a relationship - especially a serious relationship - to be rather disconcerting, and to be not only a factor, but a MAJOR factor in the high incidence of infidelity and divorce. Men and women cannot get everything they need from one relationship; they can get sex, love, intimacy, friendship, and much more, but that's still not everything. Men and women have friends in the first place because those friends share their interests, and so they can talk about things and enjoy things together that others are not necessarily privvy to.
Goo: (Goo appears incoherent and begins to babble) Neanderthals used tools of the Mousterian class, which were often produced using soft hammer percussion, with hammers made of materials like bones, antlers, and wood, rather than hard hammer percussion, using stone hammers. A result of this is that our bone industry was relatively simple. However, there is good evidence that Neanderthals routinely constructed a variety of stone implements. Neanderthal Mousterian tools most often consisted of sophisticated stone-flakes, task-specific hand-axes and spades…lots of fun stuff. Many of these tools were very sharp.
Is this gonna be like the time in high school with the keys to my dad's house? I don't think I can go 7 months without you. I probably won't even live here in 7 months. If Wini facebooks me and says you've decided to show your face and I've already moved on to a new place and cookie sheet, you will probably never be used again. For some reason this house attracts healthy eaters. It's probably all the free organic eggs. The same free organic eggs that we used to bake with together. You might never see another one again.
Choose Dynamic Text on the panel’s left side.
Other Supermen leapt from the arts pages: dancer Michel Fokine was a “Superman of the toe,” actor Robert Loraine a “Superman of the Stage,” Stravinsky a “Superman of Jazz,” Schoenberg another musical “Superman,” and singer Enrico Caruso had the “lungs . . . of a superman.”
I was thinking about why this blog means so much to me. I have many hobbies, all of which are rather social. I ride my horses and do my dance and theater and singing with other people. I cook in isolation. I can share the finished product with others and love doing so, but I'm always in the kitchen alone. My husband doesn't cook. My local friends don't cook - even most of my non-local friends don't cook. I dont' have people I can share tips and recipes with and talk about food with.
somehow escaping
Boy does killing ever require a lot of thinking. Sheesh!!
Worked with other teens in group to create a new schedule for teens only - took first trip to city alone with teens.
And there is something downright unforgiving about suits that makes me freeze up in conversation — images of interrogation, war, and other legal proceedings flashing through my mind.
Although the logic here seems valid enough, the conclusion is strange. How can Mike be liable for murder in case B when Marge isn’t dead? After all, murder requires an actual death, doesn’t it? Since the conclusion seems strange we might be inclined to think that at least one of the premises is dodgy, but let’s not be too hasty. I suspect the reason for thinking that the conclusion is strange stems from confusing liability and responsibility. This is something I’ve spoken about before. Roughly, liability is concerned with the price one has to pay for one’s actions; whereas responsibility is concerned with the outcomes that one actually brought about. Since this argument is framed in terms of liability, not responsibility, I think it makes sense: Mike must pay the same price in both cases because he controlled the same things, despite the fact that his actions led to a different result.
I was nervous about getting because
The girls had their 4 year check up. Let me tell you that as a parent there are a few things that you never want to do. First and for most, is see your babies cry!! The next is being the one to hold them down so that they can get a shot (which hurts). Our morning started out like any other and we told the girls that they had to go to the doctor for a check up, the first question out of their mouthes is: "Are we getting ouies?" What can I say? "I don't know you are going to have to ask Dr. Taylor?" Poor Dr. Taylor, she just got thrown under the bus. Now in most cases this would have been a great visit, however, since Spring decided to come a little early and my children are anything but normal when it comes to normal illnesses like the flu or colds, our well visit turns into a sick visit. Alyssa is coughing and not feeling real good, and then other two are bouncing off the walls (literally). Alyssa is running a fever and looks like a very sick little. So the nurses and Dr Taylor have decided that we should test the girls for the flu and strep. The flu swabs were the easy part, the strep swabs, went well for Addison and Avery, but with Alyssa it made her gag, and we saw it all come up. Now I am not a throw up kind of person, I can clean up just about anything, except throw up. There have been days that I am holding Alyssa's hair and have her share the toilet so I can join her, kid you not. So when it happens at the doctor's office, in a very small room, I am not sure what to do. But as it would have it that day, I handled it very gracefully. I cleaned her up and daddy cleaned up the floor and trash can (because no the nurses did not give us a throw up bag or even try to clean it up, or offer to move us to another room, I digress). The tests come back for all the girls and Addison and Avery are positive for flu A and negative for strep (mind you they are bouncing off the walls) and Alyssa comes back negative for everything. Dr. Taylor treated them all with the flu medicine though. We were back on the mend, this visit our shots were postponed. We did however, have to have a finger stick to check our cholesterol.
Ceri Radford grew up in Swansea, studied English literature and French at Cambridge and started her career with Reuters. She has since written about books, TV, culture, society, male strippers and many other things besides for publications including The Daily Telegraph, the Times Literary Supplement, and Red Magazine. She currently lives, confusingly, very close to Geneva, but in France.
And this is the smile
Summer went quick and Winter rolled back in
Season with pepper and garlic salt.
Signed 1/2 (sent other card back, unsigned)
Until tomorrow, charming ladies.... :)
Thomas said, ‘My Master! My God!’
Daniel Day-Lewis, Gangs of New York
The traditional Gospel reading for last Sunday, the Third Sunday after Epiphany, is Matthew 8:1-13. This is a good example of faith and worship together. In this case, we see the faith of the leper and then of the centurion, whose servant was at home with palsy. Both of these men approach Jesus in faith and in a posture of worship. Of the centurion, Jesus marvels and says that he has not "found such great faith, not even in Israel." It is not hard to see the connection between faith and healing in this text. Yet, we also see the leper at worship and the centurion with all of his authority pleading to Jesus that he is not worthy enough for Jesus to come under his roof (or for Jesus to come into his home). (This humility we echo in receiving the Body and Blood of the Lord in the blessed Eucharist.)
Read more at New Left Review Magazine March – April 2012
Hey guys :) How was your Saturday? Ours was fantabulous! We got to sleep in! hehe. CPT woke up and went lifting, and I hung with the family. And did chores. Then got them ready for Mandatory Fun. What, you're not familiar with that term? Well, it's like a company picnic, but you are REQUIRED to go. Hence the mandatory party. And the picnic making it the "fun" part. hehe.
I believe in this, and it's been tested by research,
You do not need to be an energy healer or reiki master or priest in order to bless others. All that it takes is a pure intention, made from the heart. (Betty is not a priest either, yet he blesses people every day!) Energy goes, where the attention flows – that is the law of attraction. Never belittle the power you have in you… In a world that is nothing but energy, a thought made out of pure intention is like a powerful prayer. It moves mountains.
Parishes are closing all across the country and directors are dipping into their endowments to keep the lights on. A lot of the blame for this is placed on the 2003 ordination of gay priest Gene Robinson as bishop (who since retired), but I think what it really going on is A., the continuing polarization of the religious environment in this country, and B., the mind-numbing boredom and dreariness of your average Episcopal Mass.
We've had a lot of rain here the last couple of weeks and it's still raining, but we're hoping that summer (and some sunshine) is on the way. These are some of our favourite summer activities.
“Truly,” she assured him.
This is pretty much BO’s plan, too, only his idea is to create such intense racial tensions, and I do mean “create” them, that there is blood flowing in the streets as indignant and outraged and vengeful black people “rise up” against the racist whites who are responsible for their plight, and who clearly use race to gin up legal charges and to keep them down in innumerable ways and through everything from “hidden code language” to outright (almost always invented) racist violence. I don’t think that BO wants to rule a new black America, he just wants a new, “fundamentally transformed” America, with himself, of course, as ruler. Black people are his pawns, used and manipulated with as much skill as the psychotic Charles Manson brainwashed his hippy dippy acolytes.
Most licences require payment of royalties based on a percentage of the net sales of the licensed product, as defined in the definitions section. Advance payments are sometimes required to be made initially or over a period of time; they are applied against running royalties. More often, royalties are collected at set periods (three months, six months or yearly) based on the net sales for the period immediately preceding.
Currently, our industry works so that the most processed stuff is cheapest. Thanks to major conglomerates and government subsidies, these industries are financially supported in ways the small farmer growing real food is not.
